LEON TROTSKY 
The Only Road 



Leon Trotsky 



THE ONLY 
ROAD 



Translated from the German by Max 
Shachtman and B> h Field 



qp 



Printed for the Communist League 
America (Opposition) by the 
Pioneer Publishers in April 1933 



THE LIBRARY 

THE UNIVERSITY 

OF TEXAS 



Tabic of Contents 



Foreword 7 

I. Bonapartism and Fascism 13 

II. Bourgeoisie, Petty Bourgeoisie and 

Proletariat 21 



III. Alliance or Struggle Between So- 

cial Democracy and Fascism 29 

IV. Thaelmann's Twenty-One Mistakes 36 

V. The Checking of the Stalin-Thael- 
mann Policy Against Their 



Own Experience 48 

VI. What They Say About the United 

Front in Prague 55 

VII. The Class Struggle in the Light 

of the Economic Cycle 67 

VIII. The Road to Socialism 77 

IX. The Only Road 85 

Afterword 92 



845768 



For ewofd 



The decline of capitalism promises to be still more 
stormy, dramatic and bloody than its rise. Ger- 
^ man capitalism will surely prove no exception. 
If its agony is being stretched out too long, the fault 
— we must speak the truth — lies with the parties of 
the proletariat. 

German capitalism appeared late on the scene, and 
was deprived of the privileges of the first-born. Rus- 
sia's development placed it somewhere between England 
and India ; Germany, in such a scheme, would have 
to occupy the place between England and Russia, but 
without the enormous oversea colonies of Great Britain 
and without the "internal colonies" of Tsarist Russia. 
Germany, squeezed into the heart of Europe, was faced 
— at a time when the whole world had already been 
divided up — with the necessity of conquering foreign 
markets and redividing colonies which had already 
been divided. 

German capitalism was not destined to swim with 
the stream, to give itself up to the free play of forces. 
Only Great Britain could afford this luxury, and then 
only for a limited historical period, which has recently 
been closed before our eyes. German capitalism could 
not even afford the "sense of moderation" of French 
capitalism, which is entrenched within its limitations 
and in addition is equipped with rich colonial posses- 
sions as a reserve. 



7 



The German bourgeoisie, opportunistic through 
and through in the domain of internal politics, had to 
rise to heights of audacity and rapidity in that of 
economy and of world politics ; it had to expand its 
production immeasurably, to catch up with the older 
nations, to rattle the sword and hurl itself into the 
war. The extreme rationalization of German indus- 
try after the war likewise resulted from the necessity 
of overcoming the unfavorable conditions of historical 
delay, of geographical situation and of military de- 
feat. 

If the economic evils of our epoch, in the last analy- 
sis, result from the fact that the productive forces of 
humanity are incompatible with private ownership of 
the means of production as well as with national boun- 
daries, German capitalism is going through the sever- 
est convulsions just because it is the most modern, most 
advanced and most dynamic capitalism on the contin- 
ent of Europe. 

The physicians of German capitalism are divided 
into three schools : liberalism, planned economy, and 
autarchy. 

Liberalism would like to restore the "national laws 
of the market". But the wretched political fate of 
liberalism only reflects the fact that German capital- 
ism could never base itself on Manchesterism, but went 
through protectionism to trusts and monopolies. Ger- 
man economy cannot be brought back to a "healthy" 
past which never existed. 

"National Socialism" promises to revise the work 
of Versailles in its own manner, i. e., in fact, to carry 
further the offensive of Hohenzollern imperialism. At 
the same time it wanes to bring Germany to autarchy, 
i. e., to the road of provincialism and voluntary re- 
striction. The lion's roar in this case covers the 
psychology of the whipped dog. To adapt German 



8 



capitalism to its national boundaries is about the 
same as to cure a sick man by cutting off his right 
hand, his left foot and part of his skull. 

To cure capitalism by means of planned economy 
would mean to eliminate competition. In such a case 
we must begin with the abolition of private ownership 
of the means of production. The bureaucratic-pro- 
fessorial reformers do not even dare to think of it. 
German economy is, least of all, purely Germany it 
is an integral constituent of world economy. A Ger- 
man plan is conceivable only in the perspective of an 
international economic plan. A planned system within 
closed national boundaries would mean the abnegation 
of world economy, i. e., the attempt to retreat to the 
system of autarchy. 

These three systems with their mutual feuds, in real- 
ity resemble each other in the respect that they are 
all shut in within the magic circle of reactionary Uto- 
pianism. What must be saved is not German capital- 
ism, but Germany — from its capitalism. 

In the years of the crisis, the German bourgeoisie, of 
its theoreticians at least, have uttered speeches of re- 
pentance — yes, they had carried out much too risky 
policies, they had too lightly resorted to the help of 
foreign credits, had pushed forward too fast the mod- 
ernization of factory equipment, etc. In the future 
one must be more careful ! In reality, however, as the 
Papen program and the attitude of finance-capital to- 
ward it have shown, the leaders of the German bour- 
geoisie incline today more than ever to economic adven- 
turism. 

At the first signs of an industrial revival, German 
capitalism will show itself to be what its historical past 
has made it, and not what the liberal moralists would 
like to make it. The entrepreneurs, hungry for pro- 
fits, will again raise the steam pressure without look- 



9 



ing at the pressure gauge. The chase for foreign 
credits will again take on a feverish character. Are 
the possibilities of expansion slight? All the more 
necessary to monopolize them for oneself. The terri- 
fied world will again see the picture of the preceding 
period, but in the form of still more violent convul- 
sions. At the same time, the restoration of German 
militarism will proceed. As if the years 1914-1918 
had never existed. The German bourgeoisie is again 
placing East Elbe barons at the head of the nation. 
Under Bonapartist auspices they are even more in- 
clined to risk the head of the nation than under those 
of the legitimate monarchy. 

In their lucid moments the leaders of German Social- 
Democracy must ask themselves, "By what miracle 
does their party, after all the damage that it has 
done, still lead millions of workers?" Certainly, great 
importance must be given to the conservatism innate 
in every mass organization. Several generations of 
the proletariat have gone through Social-Democracy as 
a political school; this has created a great tradition. 
Yet that is not the main reason for the vitality of re- 
formism. The workers cannot simply leave the Social- 
Democracy, in spite of all the crimes of that party; 
they must be able to replace it by another party. 
Meanwhile the German Communist Party, in the person 
of its leaders, has for the past nine years done decided- 
ly everything in its power to repel the masses, or at 
least prevent them from rallying around the Commun- 
ist party. 

The policy of capitulation of Stalin-Brandler in the 
year 1923; the ultra-Left zigzag of Maslow-Ruth 
Fischcr-Thaelmann in 1924-5; the opportunistic crawl- 
ing before the Social-Democracy in 1926-8; the adven- 
turism of the "third period" in 1928-30; the theory 
and practice of "social Fascism" and of "national lib- 

10 



oration" in 1930-2 — those are the items of the bill. 
The total reads : Hindenburg-Papen-Schleicher & Co.* 

On the capitalist road, there is no issue for the Ger- 
man people. Therein lies the important source of 
strength for the Communist party. The example of 
the Soviet Union shows through experience that there 
is a way out on the socialist road. Therein lies the 
second source of strength for the Communist party. 

Only — thanks to the conditions of development of 
the isolated proletarian state, there arrived at the 
leadership of the Soviet Union a national-opportunistic 
bureaucracy, which does not believe in the world rev- 
olution, which defends its independence of the world 
revolution and at the same time maintains an unlimited 
domination over the Communist International. Therein 
consists at the present time the greatest misfortune 
for the German and the international proletariat. 

The situation in Germany is as if purposely created 
to make it possible for the Communist party to win 
the majority of the workers in a short time. Only, 
the Comunist party must understand that as yet, to- 
day, it represents the minority of the proletariat, and 
must firmly tread the road of united front tactics. 
Instead of this, the Communist party has made its own 
a tactic which can be expressed in the following words: 
not to give the German workers the possibility of 
carrying on economic struggles, or offering resistance 
to Fascism, or of seizing the weapon of the general 
strike, or of creating Soviets — before the entire prole- 
tariat recognizes in advance the leadership of the Com- 
munist party. The political task is converted into 
an ultimatum. 

From where could this destructive method have 

*And now, of course, Hitler too. (Trans.) 

11 



come? The answer to this is the policy of the Stalin- 
ist fraction in the Soviet Union. There the apparatus 
has converted political leadership into administrative 
command. In refusing to permit the workers to dis- 
cuss, or criticize, or vote, the Stalinist bureaucracy 
speaks to them in no other language than that of the 
ultimatum. The policy of Thalmann is an attempt to 
translate Stalinism into bad German. But the differ- 
ence consists in the fact that the bureaucracy of the 
U. S. S. R. has at the disposal of its policy of com- 
mand the State power, which it received at the hands 
of the October revolution. Thalmann, on the other 
hand, has, for the reinforcement of his ultimatum, only 
the formal authority of the Soviet Union. This is a 
great source of moral assistance, but under the given 
conditions it suffices only to close the mouths of the 
Communist workers, but not to win over the social- 
democratic workers. But this latter task constitutes 
in fact the problem of the German revolution. 

Continuing the former works of the author, devoted 
to the policy of the German proletariat, the present 
brochure attempts to investigate the questions of Ger- 
man revolutionary policy in a new stage. 
Prinkipo, September 13, 1932. 

— U. TROTSKY. 



12 



THE LIBRARY 
THE UNIVERSITY 
OF TEXAS 



CHAPTER ONE 

Bonapartism and Fascism 



Let us endeavor to realize briefly what has occurred 
and where we stand. 
Thanks to the social democracy, the Bruening 
government had at its disposal the support of parlia- 
ment for ruling with the aid of emergency decrees. The 
social democratic leaders said : "In this manner we shall 
block the road of Fascism to power." The Stalinist 
bureaucracy said: "No, Fascism has already triumph- 
ed, it is the Bruening regime which is Fascism." Both 
were false. The social democrats palmed off a passive 
receding before Fascism as the struggle against Fasc- 
ism. The Stalinists presented the matter as if the 
victory of Fascism was already behind them. The 
fighting power of the proletariat was sapped by both 
sides and the triumph of the enemy facilitated and 
brought closer. 

In its time, we designated the Bruening government 
as Bonapartism ("caricature of Bonaipartism"), that 
is, as a regime of the military-police dictatorship. As 
soon as the struggle of two social strata — the haves 
and the have-nots, the exploiter and the exploited — 
reaches its highest tension, the conditions are given for 
the domination of bureaucracy, police, soldiery. The 
government becomes "independent" of society. Let 
us once more recall: if two forks are stuck symmetric- 
ally into a cork, the latter can stand even on the head 
of a pin. That is precisely the schema of Bonapart- 

13 



845768 



ism. To be sure, such a government does not ceas, 
bemg the clerk of the property-owners. Yet the clerk 
«*• on the back of the boss, rubs his neck raw and does 
not hesitate at tunes to dig his boots into his face 
It might have been assumed that Bruening would 

v fnU n ; *W SOlUti ° n - Yet > in the --so of 
events, another Imk inserted itself: the Papen govern- 
ment Were we to be exact, we should have to make 
a recMca lon of our old designation: the Brue^hig 
governmen was a pre-Bonapartist government. Bruin 

mrZ ° 7 3 PreCU r r - lD a P €rfected f °™' Bona- 
goveZenT' ^ * ^ Pa P-Sehleicher 

he wt - CnCe? BrUenin ^ asserte d that 

he knew no greater happiness than to "serve" Hinden- 

7 S " ght hl P Wlth h ™ fist. But with the left elbow 

Brueninf find °" ^ Sh ° ulder " In the ^hltag, 
nece s t v g n f f ° Und , a ma J° rit y wl »<* relieved him of the 
necessity of reckoning with the Reichstag 

Th e more Bruening's independence from the mrlia 
men grew , the more independent ^ 

the bureaucracy feel themselves from Bruening and the 
pohbcal groupings standing behind him. There G l 

Ihe von Papen government emerged from an immacu- 
late bureaucratic conception. With the ri«d, t Tk 

l LTo7Z um tH shoulder - With the X fi£ 

*ards off the proletariat on the Left. Therein lies 
he secret o its "stability", that is, of the flct tha 
»t did not collapse at the moment of its birth. 

The Bruening government bore a clerical-bureau 
orat lc , pollce character ^ Reichswehr er s 1Ca ^--1- 

ed in reserve. Next to the police, the "Iron 5w 
served as a direct prop of Order Tr i, « . 
wiping out the depfndeL tt'^Sfig 



14 



lay the essence of the Hindenburg-Papen coup d'Etat. 
The Generals moved up automatically to first place. 
■ The social democratic leaders turned out to be com- 
pletely duped. And it is no more than proper for 
them in periods of social crisis. These petty bour- 
geois intriguers appear to be clever only under those 
conditions where cleverness is not necessary. Now they 
pull the covers over their heads at night, sweat and 
hope for a miracle: Perhaps in the end we may yet 
be able to save not only our necks but also the over- 
stuffed furniture and the little, innocent savings. But 
there will be no more miracles. 

Unfortunately, however, the Communist party has 
also bee„ t aken completely by ,urprise by the events. 
Ihe State bureaucracy Mas unable to foresee a 
thing. Today Thalmann, Remmele and others speak 
on every occasion of "the coup d'Etat of July 20 » 
How is that? At first they contended that Fascism 
had already arrived and that only "counter-revolution- 
ary Trotskyists" could speak of it as something i„ 
the future. Now it turns out that to pass over from 
Bruening to Papen-for the present not to Hitler but 
only to Papen-a whole "coup d'Etat" was necessary. 
Yet the class content of Severing, Bruening and Hit- 
ler, these sages taught us, is "ori e and the same thing » 
then whence and wherefore the coup d'Etat? 

But the confusion doesn't come to an end with this. 
Even though the difference between Bonapartism and 
fascism has now been revealed plainly enough, That 

d E at of July 20. At the same time, they warn the 
workers against the approaching danger 'of the Hitler- 
t that is of the equally Fascist overturn. Finally, 
the social democracy is designated just as before as 
social Fascist. The unfolding event! are in this way 
reduced to this, that species of Fascism take the poTer 

15 



from each other with the aid of "Fascist" coups d'Etat 
Isn t it clear that the whole Stalinist theory was 
created only for the purpose of glueing up the human 

The less prepared the workers were, the more the 
appearance of the Papen government on the scene had 
to arouse the impression of strength: complete ignor- 
mg of the parties, new emergency decrees, dissolution 
of the Reichstag, reprisals, state of seige in the capi- 
ta abolition of the Prussian "Democracy". And 
with what ease! A lion you kill with a shot; the 
flea you squash between the fingernails; social dem- 
ocratic ministers are finished off with a fillip. 

Only i„ spi te of the appearance of concentrate( , 
forces, the I apen government "as such" is weaker yet 
than its predecessor. The Bonapartist regime can 
attain a comparatively stable and durable character 
only m the event that it brings a revolutionary epocn 
to a close; when the relationship of forces has already 
been ested ,n battles; when, the revolutionary classes 

not yet freed themselves from the fear: will not the 

TondTtL H g t" eW C r UlSi ° nS? With ° Ut this basic 
condition, that is, without a preceding exhaustion of 

he mass energies in battles, the Bon apar ti st regime 
»i no position to develop. 8 

Through the Papen government, the barons, the 
magnates of capital and the bankers have undertaken 
the attempt to secure their weal by means of the police 
and the regular army. The ide'a of giving up all 
power to Hitler, who supports himself upon the avid 
and unleashed bands of the petty bourgeoisie, is far 
trom a pleasant one to them. They do not, of course, 
doubt that in the long run Hitler will be a submissive 
instrument of their domination. Yet this is bound up 
with conclusions, with the risk of a long and weary 



civil war and great expense. To be sure, Fascism, as 
the Itahan example shows, leads in the end to a mili- 
arist-bureaucratic dictatorship of the Bonapartist 
tjpe. But for that ,t require, a number of years even 
n. the event of a complete victory: a longer pan of 
years ln Germany than in Italy. It is d *„ thVthe 
possessing classes would prefer a more economical 
path that is, the .path of Schleicher and not of ffitler 

The fact that the source of existence of the Papen 
government consists in the neutralization of the Ire 

he^r el ST * «* course, that 

the forces of the revolutionary proletariat and of the 

tf, u 7 y ,- • 6 Wh ° le q uestl °n shifts here onto 

^ron Front'^h " • ^ ° f ^ 

lS Wit^ de ™cracy Paralyzes the pro- 

u»t deceptive torm of a "strenoW x> 

cKnnp r ru ■ t ? & L raigtn of the Bonapartist 

sent day hei ' eln *" * P ° litical f °^« <* the pre- 

The Papen government represents the impersonal 
intersection of great historical forces. Its E 

in r^V 8 Z X [ t0 Therefore » could doTotn- 

ng b u take fright at its own gesticulations and grow 
dizzy from the voids arising on all sides of it S By 
this and only by this is to be explained that in the 
deeds of the government up to now there have been 
two parts of cowardice to each part of audacity. Wit," 

17 



Prussia, that is, the social democracy, the government 
played a sure game: it knew that these gentlemen 
would offer no resistance. But after it had dissolved 
the Reichstag, it summoned new elections and did not 
dare to postpone them. After proclaiming the state 
of martial law, it hastened to explain : It is only in 
order to facilitate the capitulation without a strug- 
gle of the social democratic leaders. 

However, isn't there a Reichswehr? We are not in- 
clined to forget it. Engels designated the State as 
armed detachments of people with material auxiliaries 
in the form of prisons, etc. With respect to the pre- 
sent governmental power, it can even be said that the 
Reichswehr alone really exists. But the Reichswehr 
in no way represents a submissive and guaranteed in- 
strument in the hands of that group of people at whose 
head stands Papen. In reality, the government is 
rather a sort of political commission of the Reichs- 
we-'ir. 

But with all its preponderance over the government, 
the Reichswehr can nevertheless lay no claim to any 
independent political role. A hundred thousand sol- 
diers, no matter how fused and steeled, they may be 
(which still requires testing), are incapable of com- 
manding a nation of sixty-five millions, torn by the 
profoundest social antagonisms. The Reichswehr re- 
presents only one element in the interplay of forces, 
and not the decisive one. 

In its fashion, the new Reichswehr does not reflect 
badly the political situation in the country which 
has led to the Bonapartist experiment. The parlia- 
ment without a majority, with irreconcilable wings, 
offers an obvious and irrefutable argument in favor of 
dictatorship. Once more the limits of democracy 
emerge in all their obviousness. Where it is a question 
of the foundations of society itself, it is not parlia- 

1ft 



mentary arithmetic that decides. What decides is the 
struggle. 

road the attempts at forming a government will take 
in the next days. Our hypotheses would come tardily 
in any case, and besides, it is not the possible transi- 
tional forms and combinations which decide the ques- 
tion. A bloc of the Right wing with the Center would 
signify the "legalization" of the seizure of power by 
the National-Socialists, that is, the most suitable cloak 
for the Fascist coup d'Etat. What relationships 
would develop in the early days between Hitler, Schlei- 
cher and the Center leaders, is more important for 
them than it is for the German people. Politically, 
all the conceivable combinations with Hitler signify the 
dissolution of bureaucracy, courts, police and army 
into Fascism. 

If it is assumed that the Center will not agree to 
a coalition, in which it would have to pay with a rup- 
ture with its own workers for the role of a brake in 
Hitler's locomotive, — then in this case only the uncon- 
cealed extra-parliamentary road remains. A combina- 
tion without the Center would more easily and speedily 
insure the predominance of the National-Socialists. 
If the latter do not immediately unite with Papen and 
at the same time do not pass over to the immediate 
assault, then the Bonapartist character of the gov- 
ernment will have to emerge more sharply : von Schlei- 
cher would have his "hundred days" . . . without the 
preceding Napoleonic years. 

Hundred days — no, we are fighting far too gener- 
ously. The Reichswehr does not decide. Schleicher 
does not suffice. The extra-parliamentary dictator- 
ship of the Junkers and the magnates of financial 
capital can be stood firmly on its feet only by the 



19 



method of a wearisome and relentless civil war. Will 
Hitler be able to fulfill this task? That depends not 
only upon the evil will of Fascism, but also upon the 
revolutionary will of the proletariat. 



20 



CHAPTER TWO 



Bourgeoisie, Petty Bourgeoisie 
and Proletariat 

Any serious analysis of the political situation must 
take as its point of departure the mutual rela- 
tions among the three classes : the bourgeoisie, 
the petty bourgeoisie (including the peasantry) and 
the proletariat. 

The economically powerful big bourgeoisie, in itself, 
represents an infinitesimal minority of the nation. To 
enforce its domination, it must ensure a definite mutual 
relationship with the petty bourgeoisie and through its 
mediation, with the proletariat. 

To understand the dialectic of the relationship be- 
tween the three classes, we must differentiate three his- 
torical stages : at the dawn of capitalist development, 
when the bourgeoisie required revolutionary methods 
to solve its tasks ; in the period of bloom and matur- 
ity of the capitalist regime, when the bourgeoisie en- 
dowed its domination with orderly, pacific, conserva- 
tive, democratic forms; finally, at the decline of capi- 
talism, when the bourgeoisie is forced to resort to 
methods of civil war against the proletariat to protect 
its right of exploitation. 

The political programs characteristic of these three 
stages: Jacobinism^ reformist democracy (social dem- 
ocracy included) and Fascism are basically programs 
of petty bourgeois currents. This fact alone, more 
than anything else, shows of what tremendous — ra- 
ther, of what decisive, importance the self-determina- 
tion of the petty bourgeois masses of the people is for 
the whole fate of bourgeois society. 



21 



Nevertheless, the relationship between the bourge- 
oisie and lts basic social support, the petty bourfe- 

anT' eifi S t & l ^ -"P-a/conndefce 
and pacific collaboration. In its mass, the petty bour- 
geoisie ls an exploited and disfranchised class. It re- 
gards the bourgeoisie with envy and often with hatred. 
The bourgeoisie, on the other hand, while utilizing the 
support of the petty bourgeoisie, distrusts the latter 
for it very correctly fears its tendency to break down 
the barriers set up for it from above. 

While they were laying out and clearing the road 
for bourgeois development, the Jacobins engaged at 
every step, in sharp clashes with the bourgeoisie They 
served ,t in mtransigeant struggle against it. After 
they had culminated their limited historical role, the 
Jacobins fell, for the domination of capital was pre- 
determined. " ■ 

For a whole series of stages, the bourgeoisie en- 
trenched its power under the form of parliamentary 

taST" % u" 11 then ' n0t P eacefu ^ volun^ 
tariiy. Ihe bourgeoisie was mortally afraid of uni- 

versa suffrage But in the last instance, it succeeded, 
with the aid of a combination of violent measures and 
concessions, of privations and reforms, in subordinating 
within the framework of formal democracy, not only 
the pet y bourgeoisie, but in considerable measure also 
the proletariat, by means of the new petty bourgeoisie 
-.he labor aristocracy. In August 1914 the imperial- 
ist bourgeoisie was able, with the means of parliament- 
aiy democracy, to lead millions of workers and pea- 
sants into the war. F 

But precisely with the war there begins the distinct 
dechne of capitalism and above all, of its democrat 
foim of domination. It is now no longer a matter of 
new reforms and alms, but of cutting down and abolish- 
ing the old ones. Therewith the bourgeoisie comes into 
conflict not only with the institutions of proletarian 

22 



democracy (trade unions and political parties) but 
also with parliamentary democracy, within the frame- 
work of which arose the labor organizations. There- 
fore, the campaign against "Marxism" on the one hand 
and against democratic parliamentarism on the other. 

But just as the summits of the liberal bourgeoisie 
in its time were unable, by their own force alone, to get 
rid of feudalism, monarchy and the church, so the 
magnates of finance capital are unable, by their force 
alone, to cope with the proletariat. They need the 
support of the petty bourgeoisie. For this purpose, 
it must be whipped up, put on its feet, mobilized, 
armed. But this method has its dangers. While it 
makes use of Fascism, the bourgeoisie nevertheless 
fears it. Pilsudski was forced, in May 1926, to save 
bourgeois society by a coup d'Etat directed against 
the traditional parties of the Polish bourgeoisie The 
matter went so far that the official leader of the Polish 
Communist Party, Warski, who came over from Rosa 
Luxemburg not to Lenin, but to Stalin, took the coup 
d Etat of Pilsudski to be the road of the "revolutionary 
democratic dictatorship" and called upon the workers 
to support Pilsudski. 

At the session of the Polish Commission of the Ex- 
ecutive Committee of the C. I. on July 2, 1926, the 
author of these lines said on the subject of the events 
in Poland: 

"Taken as a whole, the Pilsudski overthrow is the 
petty bourgeois, "plebeian" manner of solving the burn- 
ing problems of bourgeois society in its state of de- 
composition and decline. We have here already a 
direct resemblance to Italian Fascism. 

"These two currents indubitably possess common 
features : they recruit their shock troops first of all 
from the petty bourgeoisie; Pilsudski as well as Mus- 
solini worked with extra-parliamentary means, with 
open violence, with the methods of civil war; both were 



23 



concerned, not with the destruction, but with the pre- 
servation of bourgeois society. While they led 
the petty bourgeoisie on its feet, they openly a Wd 

geoisie. Involuntarily, an historical generalization 
comes up here, recalling the evaluation gfven by M ar " 
of Jacobinism as the plebeian method of settW ac 
counts with the feudal enemies of the bourgeoiT 
That was m the period of the rise of the boureeo sie* 
Now we mus t «ay in the period 0 f the declinZTZr- 

method J! f • bOU ^ eoisie ^ needs the "plebeian- 
method of resolving lts no longer progressive but en 
tirely react onary tasks Tn ft,;, g'essive, but en- 
caricature of Jalo^t. ^ " a 

in Z! 10 b ,° U T ° isie iS inca P ab1 ^ of maintaining itself 
W power by the means and methods of the parliament- 
ary state created by itself, it needs Fascism Ts a 

f ostile to Jacobinism, wfic^red the r3 fo^C 
J-lopment of bourgeois soci w . th 0 ^ 

Jeo-s tZ r ie r rably closer to the d ^ d ^ ^- 

o? ™ t0 the .™»g bourge- 

nevertheless, the sober bourgeois e does not 
•ok very favorably even upon the § Fascist mode o 
resolving its tasks, for the concussions, although thev 
are brought forth in the interests of bourgeois foe etT 
are linked up with dangers to it. Therefore the 2? 
po.t.on between Fascism and the bouTgS partS" 
the b,g bourgeoisie likes Fascism as little as a 
man with aching molars likes to have his teeth pulled 
The sober circles of bourgeois societv have followed 
with misgivings the work of the dentist Pilsudski, but 

? S T ly V * thCy haVe beC ° me ^conciled to the 
notable , though with threats, with horse-deals and 
all sorts of trading. Thus the petty bourgeoisie's idol 



ox c J apita r i!» y beC ° meS transf0rmed int ° ^ gendarme 
To this attempt at marking out the historical place 
otlcvT " P ° litiCal rdieVer ° f the -ocud dem- 

S the ; t e ; a ; c f ount Tr sed the theor y of 

blusSrTn t\ I f C ° Uld appear as a Pretentious, 
blustering but harmless stupidity. Subsequent events 

theorv 7 ? a Pernid0US influenCe ^ Sta ^ 

2T££S entire d — of 

Does it follow from the historical role of Jacobin- 
ism, of democracy and of Fascism that the petty bour- 

capital to the end of its days? If things were so 
then the dictatorship of the proletariat would! i m- 
possible in a number of countries in which the pe ty 
bourgeoisie constitutes the majority of the nation 

diluTL tT that ' 1* ^ * re " dered e-tremei; 
difficult m other countries in which the petty bour- 
geoisie represents an important minority. Fortunate- 
ly, things are not so. The experience of the Pa s 
Comniune first showed, at least within the limit of one 
"ty, just as the experience of the October revolu- 
tion has shown after it on a much larger cal and 

ofThe 8 " t n tvb Parably - l0ng 7 Peri ° d ' that 
Mfefi* b ° UrgC °r and the big bourgeoisie is not 
indissoluble. Since the petty bourgeoisie is incapable 

Partv an ri ile ih°rn eal - ln f SPe6Ch 1 U<)ted from the 



25 



of an independent policy (that is also why the petty 
bourgeois "democratic dictatorship" is unrealizable) 
no other choice is left for it than that between the bour- 
geoisie and the proletariat. 

In the epoch of the rise, the growth and the bloom 
Of capitalism the petty bourgeoisie, despite acute out- 
breaks of discontent, generally marched obediently in 
the capitalist harness. Nor could it do anything else 
But under the conditions of capitalist disintegration 
and of the impasse in the economic situation, the petty 
bourgeoisie strives, seeks, attempts to tear itself loose 
from the fetters of the old masters and rulers of so- 
ciety. It is quite capable of linking up its fate with 
that of the proletariat. For that, only one thing » 
needed: the petty bourgeoisie must acquire faith in the 
ability of the proletariat to lead society onto a new 
road. The proletariat can inspire this faith only by its 
strength, by the firmness of its actions, by a skillful 
offensive against the enemy, by the success of its rev- 
olutionary policy. 

But woe if the revolutionary party does not measure 
up to the height of the situation! The daily struggle 
of the proletariat sharpens the instability of bourgeois 
socety. The strikes and the political disturbances 
aggravate the economic situation of the country The 
petty bourgeoisie could reconcile itself temporarily 
to the growing privations, if it arrived by experience 
at he conviction that the proletariat is in a position 
to lead it onto a new road. But if the revolutionary 
party, m spite of a class struggle becoming incessantly 
more accentuated, proves time and again to be incap- 
able of uniting the working class about it, if it vacil- 
lates, becomes confused, contradicts itself, then the 
petty bourgeoisie loses patience and begins to look upon 
the revolutionary workers as those responsible for its 
own misery. All the bourgeois parties, including the so- 



26 



cial democracy, turn its thoughts in this very direc- 
tion. When the social crisis takes on an intolerable 
acuteness, a particular party appears on the scene with 
the direct aim of agitating the petty bourgeoisie to 
a white heat and of directing its hatred and its despair 
against the proletariat. In Germany, this historical 
function is fulfilled by National-Socialism, a broad 
current whose ideology is composed of all the putrid 
vapors of disintegrating bourgeois society. 

The principal political responsibility for the growth 
of Fascism rests, of course, on the shoulders of the 
social democracy. Ever since the imperialist war, the 
labors of this party have been reduced to uprooting 
from the consciousness of the proletariat the idea of 
an independent policy, to implanting within it the belief 
in the eternity of capitalism and to forcing it to its 
knees time and again before the decadent bourgeoisie. 
The petty bourgeoisie can follow the worker only when 
it sees m him the new master. The social democracy 
teaches the worker to be a lackey. The petty bourge- 
oisie will not follow a lackey. The policy of reform- 
ism deprives the proetariat of the possibility of leading 
the plebeian masses of the petty bourgeoisie and there- 
by alone converts the latter into cannon fodder for 
fascism. 

Politically, however, the question is not settled for 
us with the responsibility of the social democracy, 
iiyer since the beginning of the war we have denounced 
this party as the agency of the imperialist bourgeoisie 
within the ranks of the proletariat. Out of this new 
orientation of the revolutionary Marxists arose the 
Ihird International. Its task consisted in uniting the 
proletariat under the banner of the revolution and 
thereby securing for it the directing influence over 
the oppressed masses of the petty bourgeoisie in the 
towns and on the countryside. 



27 



The post -war period, in Germany more than any- 
where else, was an epoch of economic impasse and of 
civil war. The international conditions as well as the 
domestic ones pushed the country imperiously on the 
road to socialism. Every step of the social democracy 
revealed its decadence and its impotence, the reaction- 
ary import of its politics, the venality of its leaders. 
What other conditions are needed for the development 
of the Communist party? And yet, after the first 
few years of significant successes, German Communism 
entered into an era of vacillations, zigzags, alternating 
turns to opportunism and adventurism. The centrist 
bureaucracy has systematically weakened the proletar- 
ian vanguard and prevented it from bringing the class 
under its leadership. Therewith, it has robbed the 
proletariat as a whole of the possibility of drawing 
under its direction the oppressed masses of the petty 
bourgeoisie. The Stalinist bureaucracy bears the 
direct and immediate responsibility for the growth of 
Fascism before the proletarian vanguard. 



28 



CHAPTER THREE 



Alliance of Struggle Between Social 
Democracy and Fascism 

To understand the interrelationship of the classes 
in the form of a schema, fixed once and for all, 
is comparatively simple. The evaluation of the 
concrete relations betweetn the classes in every given 
situation is immeasurably more difficult. 

The German big bourgeoisie is at present vacillating 
— a condition which the big bourgeoisie, in general, 
very rarely experiences. One part has definitely come 
to be convinced of the inevitability of the Fascist path 
and would like to accelerate the operation. The other 
part hopes to become master of the situation with the 
aid of a Bonapartist military-police dictatorship. No 
one in this camp desires a return to the Weimar "dem- 
ocracy". 

The petty bourgeoisie is split up. National-Social- 
ism, whicli has united the overwhelming majority of 
the intermediate classes under its banner, wants to take 
the whole power into its own hands. The democratic 
wing of the petty bourgeoisie, which still has millions 
of workers behind it, wants a return to democracy ac- 
cording to the Ebertian model. In the meantime, it 
is prepared to support the Bonapartist dictatorship 
at least passively. The social democracy figures as 
follows: Under the pressure of the Nazis, the Papen- 
Schleicher government will be forced to establish a bal- 
ance by strengthening its Left wing; meanwhile, an 
alleviation of the crisis will perhaps ensue; the petty 

29 



perhaps decrease its frantic pressure upon the work- 
ing class a „d with the aid of God everything ^ 
once again be in order. J S 

cnJ h r + B ° napartist diqUe actual] y does not desire the 
complete victory of Fascism. It would not by any 
means be disinclined to utilize the support of the socS 
democracy within certain bounds. But for this pur 

Si Th t haVe t0 " t0lerate " the -/an l 
zat ons, which is conceivable only, if at feast to a 

Party U to be allowed. Moreover, support of the 

pus a tl dlCt t t0rShip * tHe S ° cial ^mfcrlcytol 
Sunism jfe.™"" 1 ^ tl- ranks of Com- 

Trown devd J th g * T ° f SUPP ° rt & ^ ^ 
orown dev,l the government would very soon become 

object to the blows of the red Beelzebub 

eraTfonof S ^ ded ™ S that the tol- 

eration of Bruening by the social democracy paved the 

road for Papen and that the half-toleration S Z 

ences of 0 ^ ^ bound ™, there are no differ- 
Z thl ZTl T ° UrSelveS and the Sta ^-ts. 

fhe po tics of S y f SlgmfieS tHat in timCS of crisis 
me politics of reformism no longer turn against the 
masses alone but against itself. ^ thi Z ce ^ 
critical moment has at present come into plaT 

Hitler tolerates Schleicher th* «. • 1 j 
does not oppose Pap f 1 - t T democrac J 
be assured L 1 , sltuatl °n could really 

option, i. e,, either end with the victory of the pro- 



30 



letariat or with the triumph of the Fascist counter- 
revolution. If the Communist party continues its 
policy of stupid ultimatism and thereby saves the so- 
cial democracy from inevitable collapse; if Hitler does 
not withm the near future decide upon a coup d'Etat 
and thereby provoke disintegration inside of his own 
ranks; »f the economic conjuncture takes an upward 
trend before Schleicher falls-then the Bonapartist 
combination of Paragraph 48 of the Weimar Consti- 
tution, of the Reichswehr, the semi-oppositional social 
democracy, and semi-oppositional Fascism could per- 
haps maintain itself (up to a new social impetus, 
which is to be expected in any case). 

But offhand, we are still far from such a happy ful- 
fillment of the conditions, which form the subject of 
social democratic day dreams. It is by no means guar- 
anteed. Even the Stalinists hardly believe in the 
power of resistance or the durabilitv of the Papen- 
Schleicher regime. All indications point to the de- 
composition of the Wels-Schleicher-Hitler triangle 
even before it has begun to take shape. 

But perhaps it will be replaced by a Hitler-Wels 
combination? According to Stalin they are "twins, 
not antipodes". Let us assume that the social dem- 
ocracy would, without fearing its own workers, want 
to sell its toleration to Hitler. But Hitler does not 
need this commodity: he needs not the toleration, but 
the abolition of the social democracy. The Hitler 
government can only accomplish its task by breaking 
the resistance of the proletariat and by removing all 
the possible organs of its resistance." Therein Iks 
the historical role of Fascism. 

The Stalinists confine themselves to a purely psycho- 
logical, or more exactly, to a purely moral evaluation 
ot those cowardly and avaricious petty bourgeois who 
lead the social democracy. Can we actually assume 



that these inveterate traitors would separate them- 
selves from the bourgeoisie and oppose it? Such an 
idealistic method has very little in common with Marx- 
ism, which proceeds not from what people think about 
themselves and what they desire but from the condi- 
tions m which they are placed and from the changes 
which these conditions will undergo. 

The social democracy supports the bourgeois regime, 
not for the gains of the coal, the steel and the Sher 
magnates, but for the sake of those gains which it itself 
can obtain as a party, in the person of its numerically 
great and powerful apparatus. To be sure, Fascism 
in no way threatens the bourgeois regime, for the de- 
fense of which the social democracy exists. But 
Fascism endangers that role which the social democracy 
fulfills in the bourgeois regime and the income which 
the social democracy derives from this role it plays. 
Even though the Stalinists forget this side of the mat- 
ter the social democracy itself does not for one mo- 
ment lose from its sight the mortal danger with which 
a victory of Fascism threatens i*-not the bourgeoisie, 
but it — the social democracy. 

About three years ago, when we pointed out that 
the point of departure in the coming political crisis 
m Austria and in Germany would in all probability be 
fixed by the incompatibility of social democracy and 
JT j ^ hen >. based u P° n this, we rejected the theory 
of social Fascism which was not disclosing but con- 
cealing the approaching conflict; when we called at- 
tention to the possibility that the social democracy, 
a significant part of its apparatus along with it, would 
be forced by the march of events into a struggle against 
Fascism and that this would be a favorable point of 
departure for the Communist party for a further at- 
tack, very many Communists— not only hired func- 
tionaries, but even quite honest revolutionists-ac- 
cused us of . . . "idealizing" the social democracy. 



32 



Nothing remained but to shrug our shoulders. It is 
hard to dispute with people whose thought stops 
there where the question first begins for the Marxist. 

In conversations, I often cited the following exam- 
ple: the Jewish bourgeoisie in Czarist Russia repre- 
sented an extremely frightened and demoralized part 
of the entire Russian bourgeoisie. And yet, insofar 
as the pogroms of the Black Hundreds, which were 
in the main directed against the Jewish poor, also hit 
the bourgeoisie, the latter was forced to take up its 
self-defense. To be sure, it did not show any remarkable 
bravery on this field either. But due to the danger 
hanging over their heads, the liberal Jewish bourge- 
oisie, for example, collected considerable sums for the 
arming of revolutionary workers and students. In this 
manner, a temporary practical agreement was arrived 
at between the most revolutionary workers, who were 
prepared to fight with guns in hand, and the most 
frightened group of the bourgeoisie, which had got into 
a scrape. 

Last year I wrote that in the struggle against 
Fascism the Communists were duty-bound to come to 
a practical agreement not only with the devil and his 
granddam, but even with Grzesinsky. This sentence 
made its way through the entire Stalinist world press. 
Was better proof needed of the "social Fascism" of 
the Left Opposition? Many comrades had warned me 
in advance : "They are going to seize on this phrase". 
I answered them : "It has been written so that they 
seize on it. Just let them seize upon this hot iron and 
burn their fingers. The blockheads must get their 
lesson." 

The course of the struggle has led to Von Papen 
making Grzesinsky acquainted with the inside of a jail. 
Did this episode follow from the theory of social Fasc- 
ism and from the prognoses of the Stalinist bureau- 
cracy? No, it occurred in complete contradiction of 



33 



the latter. Our evaluation of the situation, however, 
had such an eventuality in view and had assigned a 
definite place for it. 

But the social democracy this time, too, avoided 
the struggle!, some Stalinist will object. Yes, it did 
avoid it. Whoevei\ expected the social democracy, 
to go beyond the urging of its leaders and inde- 
pendently to take up the struggle, and at that, under 
conditions in which even the Communist party showed 
itself incapable of struggle, naturally had to be ex- 
perience disappointment. We did not expect such 
miracles. Therefore we could not lay ourselves open 
to any "disappointments" about the social democracy. 

Grzcsinsky has not become transformed into a revolu- 
tionary tiger; that we will readily grant. But never- 
theless, there is quite a difference between a situation 
in which Grzcsinsky, sitting in his fortress, sends out 
police detachments for the safeguarding of "dem- 
ocracy" against revolutionary workers, and a situa- 
tion in which the Bonapartist savior of capitalism 
puts Grzesinsky himself in jail, is there not? And are 
we not to take this difference into account politically; 
are we not to take advantage of it? 

Let us turn back to the example cited above: it is 
not hard to grasp the difference between a Jewish 
manufacturer who tips the Czarist policeman for beat- 
ing down the strikers and the same manufacturer who 
turns over money to the strikers of yesterday to ob- 
tain arms against the pogromists. The bourgeois re- 
mains the same. But from the change in the situa- 
tion there results a change in relations. The Bolshe- 
viki conducted the strike against the manufacturer. 
Later on, they took money from the same manufacturer 
for the struggle against the pogroms. That did not, 
naturally, prevent the workers, when their hour had 
come, from turning their arms against the bourgeoisie. 

Does all that has been said mean that the social 

34 



democracy as a whole will light against Fascism? To 
this we reply : part of the social democratic function- 
aries will undoubtedy go over to the Fascists ; a consi- 
derable section will creep under their beds in the hour 
of danger. The working masses also will not fight in 
their entirety. To guess in advance Avhat part of the 
social democratic workers will be drawn into the strug- 
gle, and when, and what part of the apparatus they 
will tear along with them, is altogether impossible. 
That depends upon many circumstances, among them, 
also, upon the position of the Communist party. The 
policy of the united front has as its task to separate 
those who want to fight from those who do not; to 
push forward those who vacillate ; finally to compro- 
mise the capitulationist leaders in the eyes of the work- 
ers in order to consolidate the fighting capacity of the 
latter. 

How much time has been lost— aimlessly, senselessly, 
shamefully ! How much could have been achieved, 
even in the last two years alone ! Was it not clear 
in advance that monopolistic capital and its Fascist 
army would drive the social democracy with fists and 
blackjacks toward the road of opposition and of self- 
defense? This prognosis should have been unfolded 
before the eyes of the entire working class, the initia- 
tive should have been taken for the united front and 
this initiative should have been retained firmly in our 
hands at every new stage. It was not necessary to 
shout, nor to scream. An, open game could have been 
played quietly. It would have sufficed to formulate, 
in a clear-cut manner, the inevitability of every next 
step of the enemy and to set up a practical program 
for a united front, without exaggerations and without 
haggling, but also without weakness and without con- 
cessions. How high the Communist party would stand 
today if it had assimilated the A B C of Leninist policy 
and applied it with the necessary perseverance ! 

35 



CHAPTER FOUR 



Thaelman's Twenty One Mistakes 

In the middle of July appeared a brochure with 
Thalmann's answers to twenty-one questions by 
social democratic workers on how the "Red united 
front" is to be created. The brochure begins with 
the words: "Mightily the anti-Fascist united front 
rushes ahead!" On July 20 the Communist party 
called upon the workers to come out in a political 
strike. The appeal met with no response. Thus with- 
in five days was the tragic abyss revealed between bu- 
reaucratic rhetoric and political reality. 

The party received 5,300,000 votes in the elections 
of July 31. By trumpeting forth this result as a 
tremendous victory, the party showed how greatly the 
defeats have diminished its claims and hopes. In the 
first balloting for the presidential election, on March 
13, the party received almost five million votes. In 
the course of four and a half months — and what 
months! — it therefore barely gained three hundred 
thousand votes. The Communist press repeated hun- 
dreds of times in March that the number of votes would 
have been incomparably larger had it been a Reichstag 
election: in a presidential election, hundreds of thou- 
sands of sympathizers deemed it superfluous to lose 
any time over a "platonic" demonstration. If this 
March commentary is taken into consideration — and 
it deserves to be taken into consideration — it follows 
that the party has practically not grown at all in the 
last four and a half months. 



36 



In April, the social democracy elected Hindenburg, 
who thereupon carried out a coup d'Etat aimed direct- 
ly at the former. One would think that this fact alone 
ought to have sufficed to convulse the structure of re- 
formism to its very foundations. Add to this the further 
accentuation of the crisis with all its frightful con- 
sequences. Finally, on July 20, eleven days before 
the elections, the social democracy drew its tail miser- 
ably between its legs at the coup d'Etat of the federal 
president it elected. In such periods revolutionary 
parties grow feverishly. Whatever the social dem- 
ocracy, forced into a steel vise, may yet undertake to 
do, it must drive the workers away from it to the Left. 
But instead of striding forward with seven league 
boots, Communism marks time, vacillates, is on the re- 
treat, and after each step forward it takes half a step 
backward. To exult over a victory only because the 
Communist party suffered no loss of votes on July 31, 
is to lose the sense of reality for good. 

In order to understand why and how the revolution- 
ary party condemns itself to a debasing impotence un- 
der exceptionally favorable political conditions, one 
must read Thalmann's answers to the social democratic 
workers. A wearisome and unpleasant job, but it may 
enlighten one on what is taking place in the minds of 
the Stalinist leaders. 

To the question: "How do the Communists evaluate 
the character of the Papon government?", Thalmann 
gives several mutually contradictory replies. He be- 
gins with a reference to "the danger of the immediate 
establishment of the Fascist dictatorship." Then it 
follows that it docs not yet exist? He speaks with com- 
plete accuracy of the government members as "repre- 
sentatives of trust capital, of the generals and of 
Junkerdom". A minute later he says about the same 
government : "this Fascist cabinet", and concludes his 
reply with the assertion that "the Papen government 

37 



. . . has set itself the aim of the immediate establish- 
ment of the Fascist dictatorship." 

By disregarding the social and political distinctions 
between Bonapartism, that is, the regime of "civil 
peace" resting upon military-police dictatorship, and 
Fascism, that is, the regime of open civil war against 
the proletariat, Thalmann deprives himself in advance 
of the possibility of understanding what is taking place 
before his very eyes. If Papen's cabinet is a Fascist 
cabinet then what Fascist "danger" is he talking 
about? If the workers will believe Thalmann that 
Papen sets himself the aim ( !) of establishing the 
Fascist dictatorship, then the probable conflict between 
Hitler and Papen-Schleicher will catch the party nap- 
ping just as the conflict between Papen and Otto 
Braun did in its time.* 

To the question, "Is the Communist Party of Ger- 
many sincere about the united front?", Thalmann na- 
turally answers affirmatively, and for proof he refers 
to the fact that the Communists do not go hat in hand 
to Hindenburg and Papen. "No, we put the question 
of the struggle, of the struggle against the whole sys- 
tem, against capitalism. And here lies the kernel* of 
the sincerity of our united front." 

Thalmann manifestly does not understand what it 
is all about. The social democratic workers remain 
social democrats precisely because they still believe in 
the gradual, reformist road to the transformation of 
capitalism into socialism. Since they know that the 
Communists stand for the revolutionary overthrow of 
capitalism, the social democratic workers ask: Do you 
sincerely propose the united front to us? To this 
Thalmann replies; "Naturally, sincerely, for with us 



* These lines were written at the beginning of August, be>- 
fore the negotiations between Hindenburg-Papen and Hitler. 



38 



it is a question of overthrowing the whole cacpitalist 
system". 

Of course, it does not occur to us to conceal any- 
thing from the social democratic workers. Neverthe- 
less, one must know the measure of things and preserve 
the political proportions. A skilled propagandist 
should have answered in the following manner: "You 
put your stakes on democracy ; we believe that the only 
way out lies in the revolution. Yet we cannot and we 
do not want to make the revolution without you. Hit- 
ler is now the common foe. After the victory over him 
we shall draw the balance together with you and see 
whither the further road actually leads." 

The auditors, peculiar as this may seem at first 
sight, not only listen forbearingly to the speaker but 
even agree with him many times. The secret of their 
forbearance, however, rests upon the fact that Thal- 
mann's partners in the conversation not only belong 
to the Anti-Fascist Action but also call for the cast- 
ing of votes for the Communist party. They are 
former social democrats who have gone over to the side 
of Communism. Such recruits can only be welcomed, 
But what is deceptive in the whole affair is that a con- 
versation with workers who have broken with the social 
democracy is palmed off as a conversation with the 
social democratic mass. This cheap masquerade is 
highly characteristic of the whole present-day policy 
of Thalmann and Co. ! 

However this may be — the former social democrats 
put questions which actually agitate the social dem- 
ocratic mass. "Is the Anti-Fascist Action a Commun- 
ist party business?" they ask. Thalmann replies: 
"No!" The proof? The Anti-Fascist Action "is no 
organization but a mass movement". As if it were 
not just the task of the Communist party to organize 
the mass movement. Still better is the second argu- 
ment: the Anti-Fascist Action is non-partisan, for ( !) 



39 



it directs itself against the capitalist state: "Karl 
Marx, in dealing with the lessons of the Paris Com- 
mune, already placed in the foreground in all sharp- 
ness, as the task of the working class, the question 
of smashing the bourgeois state apparatus." O hap- 
less quotation! For what the social democrats want, 
regardless of Marx, is to perfect the bourgeois state, 
but not to smash it. They are not Communists, but 
reformists. Despite his intentions, Thalmann proves 
just the thing he would like to refute — the party char- 
acter of the "Anti-Fascist Action." 

The official leader of the Communist parly obvious- 
ly understands neither the situation nor the political 
thought of the social democratic workers. He does not 
understand what purpose the united front serves. With 
every one of his sentences, he delivers weapons to the 
reformist leaders and drives the social democratic 
workers to them. 

The impossibility of any kind of joint step with the 
social democracy is demonstrated by Thalmann in the 
following manner: "In this connection we [?] must 
clearly recognize that the social democracy, even when 
it today mimics a sham opposition, will at no moment 
give up its actual thoughts of coalition and its com- 
pacts with the Fascist bourgeoisie." Even if this were 
right, there would nevertheless remain the task of prov- 
ing it to the social democratic workers through experi- 
ence. However* it is also false in essence. If the so- 
cial democratic leaders do not want to abandon com- 
pacts with the bourgeoisie, the Fascist bourgeoisie, 
however, does abandon compacts with the social dem- 
ocracy. And this fact may become decisive for the 
fate of the social democracy. In the passage of power 
from Papcn to Hitler, the bourgeoisie will in no way 
be able to spare the social democracy. The civil war 
has its laws. The reign of the Fascist terror will and 
can mean only the abolition of the social democracy. 



40 



Mussolini began with just that, so as to be able all 
the more unrestrainedly to crush the revolutionary 
workers. In any event, the "social Fascist" cherishes 
his hide. The Communist united front policy at the 
present time must proceed from the concern of the so- 
cial democracy for its own hide. That will be the 
most realistic and at the same time, in its results, the 
most revolutionary policy. 

But if the social democracy will "at no moment" 
separate itself from the Fascist bourgeoisie (although 
Matteoti "separated" himself from Mussolini), do not 
the social democratic workers, who want to take part 
in the Anti-Fascist Action, have to leave their party? 
Thus runs one question. To this Thalmann replies: 
"For us Communists it is a matter of course that so- 
cial democratic or Reichsbanner workers may take part 
in the Anti-Fascist Action without having to leave 
their party." To show himself free from sectarian- 
ism, Thalmann adds: "If you were to stream into it 
by the millions, in a serried front, we would greet it 
with joy, even if a lack of clarity still exists in your 
minds, in our opinion, about certain questions of esti- 
mating the Social Democratic Party of Germany." 
Golden words ! We consider your party to be Fascist, 
you consider it to be democratic, but let's not dispute 
over petty matters. It suffices for you to come to us 
"by the millions", without leaving your Fascist party. 
"Lack of clarity about certain questions" cannot con- 
stitute an obstacle. But, O, the lack of clarity in the 
heads of the all-powerful bureaucrats is an obstacle at 
every step. 

To give depth to the question, Thalmann proceeds 
to say : "We do not put the question of party to party, 
but on a class basis." Like Seydew T itz, Thalmann is 
prepared to renounce party interests in the interests 
of the class. The misfortune lies in this, that for a 
Marxist there cannot be such a contrast. Were not 



41 



its program the scientific formulation of the interests 
of the working class, the party would not be worth a 
penny. 

Only, along with the crude mistake in principle, 
Thalmann's words contain also a practical absurdity. 
How is it possible not to put the question "of party 
to party" when that is just where the very essence of 
the question lies? Millions of workers follow the social 
democracy. Other millions — the Communist party. To 
the question of the social democratic workers : How 
shall we today achieve joint actions between your party 
and ours against Fascism, Thalmann answers : "on a 
class and not a party basis" : stream toward us by the 
millions. Isn't this the most wretched bombast? 

"We Communists," continues Thalmann, "do not 
want unity at any price." We cannot, in the interest 
of unity with the social democracy, "disavow the class 
content of our policy . . . and renounce strikes, strug- 
gles of the unemployed, actions of the tenants and rev- 
olutionary mass defense". The agreement on definite 
practical actions is misconstrued into an absurd unity 
with the social democracy. Out of the indispensabil- 
ity of the final revolutionary assault of tomorrow, is 
deduced the impermissibility of harmonized strike or 
self-defense actions for today. Whoever can see rhyme 
or reason in Thalmann's thoughts deserves a prize of 
distinction. 

The auditors press : "Is an alliance of the C. P. G. 
and the S. D. P. G. possible in the struggle against 
the Papen government and against Fascism?" Thai; 
mann mentions two or three facts as evidence that the 
social democracy does not fight against Fascism and 
concludes: "Every [ ! !] S. D. P. G. comrade will say 
we are right [?] when we say that an alliance between 
the C. P. G. and the S. D. P. G. is impossible on the 
basis of these facts and also [ !] for reasons of prin- 
ciple [! !]." The bureaucrat again assumes just the 

42 



thing that should be proved. Ultimatism acquires a 
particularly ludicrous character as soon as Thalmann 
replies to the question of the united front with organi- 
zations which embrace millions of workers. The social 
democrats must acknowledge that an agreement with 
their party is impossible because it is Fascist. Can 
Wels and Leipart be rendered a better service? 

"We Communists, who reject any accord with the 
S. X). P. G. leaders. . .repeatedly declare that we are 
at all times ready for the anti-Fascist struggle with 
the militant social democratic and Reichsb.anner com- 
rades and with the lower [?] militant organizations." 
Where do the lower organizations come to an end? 
And what is to be done if the lower organizations sub- 
mit to the discipline of the upper, and propose that the 
negotiations shall be begun with the latter? Finally, 
between the lower and the upper there are intermediate 
storeys. And can one prophecy where the dividing line 
will be between those who want to fight and those who 
dodge the struggle? This can be determined only in 
action and not by anticipatory appraisals. What 
sense is there in binding oneself hand and foot? 

In Die rote fahne of July 29, in a report of a 
Reichsbanner meeting, the noteworthy words of a social 
democratic company commander are mentioned: "The 
will to an anti-Fascist united front exists in the masses. 
If the leaders fail to take it into account, then I will 
go to the united front over their heads." The Com- 
munist paper reproduces these words without comment. 
Yet they contain the key to the whole tactic of the uni- 
ted front. The social democrat wants to fight against 
the Fascists in common with the Communists. He is 
already in doubt about the good will of his leaders. If 
the leaders refuse, says he, then I shall go over their 
heads. Social democrats similarly disposed can be 
counted by the dozens, hundreds, thousands, millions. 
It is the task of the Communist party really to show 



43 



them whether or not the social democratic leaders want 
to fight. This can be demonstrated only through ex- 
perience, through a new, fresh experience, in a new 
situation. This experience will not be gained at one 
blow. The social democratic leaders must be subjected 
to a test: in the factory and workshop, in town and 
country, in, tl|e whole state, today and} totmorrow. 
We must repeat our proposal, put it in a new form, 
from a new angle, adapted to the new situation. 

But Thalmann will have none of it. On the ground 
of the "principle distinctions shown to exist between 
the C. P. G. and the S. D. P. G. we reject negotiations 
from the top with the S. D. P. G.'\ This shattering 
argument is repeated by Thalmann several times. But 
if there were no "antagonisms in principle" then there 
would be no two parties. And if there were no two 
parties, there would be no question of the united front. 
Thalmann wants to prove far too much. Less — would 
be better. 

Did not the founding of the Red Trade Union Or- 
ganization, ask the workers, signify "a splitting of the 
organized working class"? I^o, replies Thalmann, and 
as proof he cites Engels' letter of 1895 against the 
aesthetic-sentimental philanthropists. Who is handing 
Thalmann such treacherous quotations? The 11. T. 
U. 0. is created in the spirit of unity and not of 
schism. Also, the worker is in no case to leave his 
trade union organization in order to join the R. T. U. 
O. On the contrary, it were better if the R. T. U. O. 
members remained in the trade unions in order to carry 
on oppositional work therein. Thalmann's words may 
sound convincing to Communists who have set them- 
selves tlje task of fighting against the social democratic 
leadership. But as an answer to social democratic 
workers, who are concerned with trade union unity, 
Thalmann's words sound like a mockery. Why have 
you left our trade unions and organized yourselves 

44 



separately? — ask the social democratic workers. If 
you want to enter our separate organization in order 
to fight against the social democratic leadership, we 
do not demand of you to leave the trade unions, 
Thalmann replies. An appropriate reply, right on 
the head of the nail! 

"Is there democracy within the C. P. G.?" ask the 
workers, passing over to another theme. Thalmann 
replies in the affirmative. And how ! But he immedi- 
ately adds unexpectedly: "In legality as well as in il- 
legality, most particularly in the latter, the party must 
be on guard against spies, provocateurs and police 
agents." This interpolation is not made accidentally. 
The latest doctrine, proclaimed throughout the world 
in the brochure of a mysterious Biichner, justifies the 
strangulation of democracy in the interest of the 
struggle against spies. Whoever protests against the 
autocracy of the Stalinist bureaucracy must be de- 
clared a suspicious character at the very least. The 
police agents and provocateurs of every country revel 
with enthusiasm over this theory. They will hound 
Oppositionists louder than anyone else : this may divert 
attention from themselves and enable them to fish in 
troubled waters. 

The flourishing of democracy is also demonstrated, 
according to Thalmann, by the fact that "the problems 
are dealt with at World Congresses and Conferences of 
the E. C. C. I." The speaker fails to report when the 
last World Congress took place. We will call it to 
mind: in July 1928, more than four years ago! Ap- 
parently no noteworthy questions have arisen since 
then. Why, be it asked in passing, doesn't Thalmann 
himself convoke an extraordinary German party con- 
vention to resolve the questions upon which depend the 
fate of the German proletariat? Certainly not be- 
cause of an excess of party democracy. 

So runs page after page. Thalmann replies to twenty- 



45 



one questions. Every reply — a mistake. In sum — 
twenty-one mistakes, not counting the small and sec- 
ondary ones. And they are numerous. 

Thalmann relates that the Bolsheviks broke with 
the Mensheviks in 1903. In reality, the split first 
took place in 1912. But even that did not prevent 
the February revolution in 1917 from finding united 
Bolshevik and Menshevik organizations over a large 
part of the country. As late as the beginning of 
April, Stalin came out for the unification of the Bol- 
sheviks with Tseretelli's party — not the united front 
but the fusion of the parties! This was prevented onlv 
by Lenin's arrival. 

Thalmann says that the Bolsheviks dispersed the 
Constituent Assembly in 1917. In reality this occur- 
red at the begining of 1918. Thalmann is not at all 
familiar with the history of the Russian revolution 
and the Bolshevik party. 

Far worse, however, is the fact that he does not 
grasp the foundations of the Bolshevik tactic. In his 
"theoretical" articles, he even dares to dispute the fact 
that the Bolsheviks concluded an agreement with the 
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionists against Korni- 
lov. As proof, he adduces quotations shoved under 
his door by somebody or other, which have nothing to 
do with the matter. But he forgets to answer the ques- 
tions : Were there Committees for the Defense of the 
People throughout the land during the Kornilov 
putsch? Did they direct the struggle against Korni- 
lov? Did representatives of the Bolsheviks, Menshe- 
viks and Social Revolutionists belong to these Com- 
mittees? Yes, yes, yes. Were the Mensheviks and So- 
cial Revolutionists in power at that time? Did they 
persecute the Bolsheviks as agents of the German gen- 
eral staff? Were thousands of Bolsheviks confined to 
prisons? Did Lenin hide in illegality? Yes, yes, yes. 
What quotations can refute these historical facts? 



46 



Let Thalmann appeal to his heart's content to Man- 
uilsky, Losovsky and Stalin himself (if the latter ever 
opens his mouth). But let him leave in peace Lenin- 
ism and the history of the Russian revolution: for him 
they are books sealed with seven seals. 

* # 

In conclusion one must throw into relief still another 
question, which stands by itself : it concerns Versailles. 
The social democratic workers ask if the Communist 
party isn't making political concessions to National 
Socialism. In his reply, Thalmann continues to defend 
the slogan of "national emancipation" and to place 
it on the same plane with the slogan of social emancipa- 
tion. The reparations — what is left of them now — are 
just as important to Thalmann as private ownership 
of the means of production. This policy is as if con- 
trived uniquely to divert the attention of the work- 
er from the basic problem, to weaken the blow against 
capitalism and to compel one to seek the principal foe 
and author of poverty on the other side of the frontier. 
However, now more than ever before, "the main enemy 
is at home!" Von Schleicher expressed this idea even 
more coarsely: before anything else, he declared on 
the radio on July 26, we must "put an end to the dirty 
swine at home"! This soldier's formula is very good. 
We pick it up willingly. Every Communist must firm- 
ly adopt it as his own. While the Nazis divert atten- 
tion to Versailles, the Communist workers must retort 
to them with Schleicher's words: no, before anything 
else we must put an end to the dirty swine at home! 



47 



CHAPTER FIVE 



TKe Checking of the Stalin -Tliaelman 
Policy Against Theif Own Experience 

Tactics are tested in the most critical and crucial 
moments. The strength of Bolshevism rested 
upon this, that its slogans and methods found 
their supreme confirmation as soon as the course of 
events demanded bold decisions. What value have prin- 
ciples which must be renounced as soon as the situa- 
tion assumes a serious character? 

Realistic policy bases itself upon the natural devel- 
opment of the class struggle. Sectarian policy en- 
deavors to prescribe artificial regulations for the class 
struggle. The revolutionary situation signifies the 
highest accentuation of the class struggle. Just be- 
cause of that, the realistic policy of Marxism, in the 
revolutionary situation, exercises a powerful force of 
attraction upon the mass. The sectarian policy, on 
the contrary, becomes all the weaker the more mighty 
is the impetus of events. The Blanquists and Proud- 
honists, taken by suprisc by the events of the Paris 
Commune, did the opposite of what they had constant- 
ly preached. During the Russian revolution, the an- 
archists were forcer! to recognize the Soviets, that is, 
the organs of power. And so on without end. 

The Comintern supports itself upon masses who 
were won over in the past by Marxism and fused to- 
gether by the authority of the October revolution. 
Only, the policy of the present leading Stalin faction 



48 



seeks to command the class struggle instead of invest- 
ing it with political expression. This is the essential 
feature of bureaucratism and in this it coincides with 
sectarianism from which it distinguishes itself sharply 
in other features. Thanks to the strong apparatus, 
to the material means of the Soviet state and to the 
authority of the October revolution, the Stalinist bu- 
reaucracy has been able, in comparatively calm per- 
iods, to impose for a length of time artificial measures 
of restraint upon the proletarian vanguard. But to 
the degree that the class struggle condenses itself into 
civil war, the bureaucratic prescriptions come into in- 
creasing collision with unrelenting reality- Faced by 
sharp turns in the situation, the arrogant and inflated 
bureaucracy easily lands in a muddle. If it cannot 
command, it caipitualtes. The policy of the Thal- 
raann Central Committee in recent months will some 
day be studied as a model of the most pitiable and 
miserable headlessness. 

Since the "Third Period" it was held to be inviolable 
that there could be no talk about agreements with the 
social democracy. It was not only inadmissible to as- 
sume the initiative in the united front, as the Third 
and Fourth World Congresses taught — but even pro- 
posals for common actions emanating from the social 
democracy had to be rejected. The reformist leaders 
are "sufficiently exposed." The experience of the past 
is sufficient. Instead of pursuing politics, the masses 
must be told history. To turn to the reformists with 
proposals means to acknowledge them capable of fight- 
ing. That alone would be Social Fascism, ect. Thus 
intoned the ear-deafening melody of the ultra-Leftist 
barrel-organ in the last three-four years. And look: 
in the Prussian Landtag, the Communist fraction pro- 
posed on June 22, unexpected by all and by itself, an 
agreement with the social democracy and even with the 
Center. The same thing was repeated in Hessen. In 



49 



face of the danger that the Presidium of the Landtag 
might fall into the hands of the Nazis, all the con- 
secrated principles flew to the devil. Isn't this astound- 
ing? And isn't it debasing? 

To explain these goat-leaps, however, is not so dif- 
ficult. As is known, many superficial liberals and 
radicals continue to joke their whole life long about 
religion and celestial powers, only to call for a priest 
when they face death or serious illness. So also in 
politics. The mark of Centrism is opportunism. Un- 
der the influence of external circumstances (tradition, 
mass pressure, political competition), Centrism is at 
certain times compelled to make a parade of radical- 
ism. For this purpose it must overcome itself, violate 
its political nature. By spurring itself on with all 
its strength, it not infrequently lands at the extreme 
limit of formal radicalism. But hardly does the 
hour of serious danger strike than the true nature 
of Centrism breaks out to the surface. In so delicate 
a question as the defense of the Soviet Union the 
Stalinist bureaucracy always built much more upon the 
bourgeois pacifists, English trade union bureaucrats 
and French radicals than upon the revolutionary move- 
ment of the proletariat. Scarcely did an external 
danger approach than the Stalinists promptly sacri- 
ficed not only their ultra-Leftist phrases but also the 
vital interests of the international revolution — in the 
name of amity with uncertain and false "friends" of 
the genus of lawyers, writers and simple drawing room 
heroes. United front from above? Under no circum- 
stances ! At the same time, however, the Top-Com- 
missar for Ambiguous Affairs, Munzenberg by name, 
fished around after the coat tails of all sorts of liberal 
jabberers and radical tripe "for the defense of the U. 
S. S. R." 

The Stalinist bureaucracy in Germany, as in every 
other country — except in the Soviet Union — is ex- 



50 



tremely dissatisfied with the compromising leadership 
of Barbusse in the affair of the Anti-War Congress. 
On this field, Thalmann, Foster and others would pre- 
fer to be radical. Yet in their own national affairs, 
every one of them proceeds according to the same 
model as the Moscow authorities : at the approach of 
a serious danger they cast off the inflated, falsified 
radicalism in order to reveal their true, that is, their 
opportunistic nature. 

Was the initiative of the Communist Landtag frac- 
tion, as such, false and inadmissible? We don't think 
so. The Bolsheviks more than once proposed to the 
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionists in 1917 : "Take 
the power, we will support you against the bourgeoisie 
if it should resist." Compromises are admissible and, 
under certain conditions — obligatory. The whole 
question lies in what aim the compromise shall sub- 
serve ; how it looks to the masses ; what its limits are. 
To confine the compromise to the Landtag or the 
Reichstag, to regard as an independent aim whether 
the president will be a social democrat or a Catholic 
democrat instead of a Fascist, means to sink complete- 
ly into parliamentary cretinism. Completely different 
is the situation when the party sets itself the task of 
the systematic and planned struggle for the social 
democratic workers on the basis of the united front 
policy. A parliamentary agreement against Fascist 
predominance in the presidium, etc., would in this case 
constitute merely one component part of the extra- 
parliamentary fighting agreement against Fascism. 
Naturally the Communist party would prefer to re- 
solve the whole question at one blow outside of par- 
liament. But preferences alone are not sufficient where 
the forces are lacking. The social democratic workers 
have demonstrated their faith in the magic power of 
the July 31 vote. It is from this fact that we must 
proceed. The former mistakes of the Communist 



51 



party (Prussian referendum, etc.) extraordinarily 
facilitated the sabotage of the united front practised 
by the reformist leaders. A technical parliamentary 
agreement — or even only the proposal for such an 
agreement — must help free the Communist party from 
the accusation that it is collaborating with the Fasc- 
ists against the social democracy. This is no inde- 
pendent action, but solely the clearing of the road to 
a fighting agreement or at least to the struggle for a 
fighting agreement of the mass organizations. 

The difference between the two lines is entirely ob- 
vious. The joint struggle with the social democratic 
organizations can, and in its unfolding it must, as- 
sume a revolutionary character. The possibility for 
an approach to the social democratic masses can and 
must be paid for, under certain conditions, even with 
parliamentary agreements at the top. But for a Bol- 
shevik, this is merely the admission price. The Stalin- 
ist bureaucracy acts in the opposite manner: it not 
only rejects fighting agreements, but still worse, it 
maliciously destroys those agreements which arise 
from below. At the same time, it proposes to the 
social democratic deputies a parliamentary accord. 
This means that at the moment of danger it declares 
its own ultra-Leftist theory and praxis to be worth- 
less ; only it does not replace it with the policy of 
revolutionary Marxism but with an unprincipled par- 
liamentary combination in the spirit of the "lesser 
evil". 

We will indeed be told, the Prussian and Hessian 
episodes were a mistake of the deputies and were made 
good again by the Central Committee. In the first 
place, a decision so important in principle should not 
have been taken without the Central Committee: the 
mistake falls back completely upon the latter as well; 
in the second iplace: how explain that the "steel-hard", 
"consistent", "Bolshevist" policy, after months of 



52 



blustering and screeching, of polemic, of villification 
and expulsions, at once gives way at the critical mo- 
ment to an opportunistic "mistake"? 

But the matter is not confined to the Landtag. 
Thalmann-Remmele have absolutely renounced them- 
selves and their own school in a much more responsible 
and critical question. On the eve of July 20, the Cen- 
tral Committee of the Communist party adopted the 
following decision: 

"The Communist party, before the proletarian pub- 
lic, addresses to the S. P. D., to the A. D. »« B., and 
to the Afa-Bund the question if they are prepared to 
carry out, together with the Communist party, the 
general strike for the proletarian demands." 

This decision, so important and unexpected, was 
made public by the Central Committee in its circular 
letter of July 26 without any commentary. Can a 
more annihilating judgment be made of its whole pre- 
ceding policy? The approach to the reformist sum- 
mits with the proposal of joint actions was but yes- 
terday declared to be social-Fascist and counter- 
revolutionary. Because of this question Communists 
were expelled. On this ground the struggle against 
"Trotskyism" was conducted. How then was this 
Central Committee suddenly able, at one stroke, on the 
eve of July 20, to bow before what it had the day be- 
fore banished? And to what tragic state has the bu- 
reaucracy brought the party when the Central Com- 
mittee could dare to come before it with its amazing 
decision without explaining or justifying it! 

The policy is tested upon such turns. The Central 
Committee of the German Communist Party in reality 
demonstrated to the whole world on the eve of July 20 : 
"Up to this moment our course was good for nothing." 
An involuntary but completely correct admission. Un- 
fortunately, even the proposal of July 20, which over- 
threw the preceding policy, could in no case yield a 

53 



positive result. An appeal to the summits — independ- 
ently of the present answer of these summits — can be- 
come of revolutionary significance only when it has 
been previously prepared from below, that is, when it 
is based upon the whole policy in its totality. But the 
Stalinist bureaucracy repeated to the social democratic 
workers, day in and day out: "We Communists re- 
ject any connection with the S. P. D. leaders" (see 
Thalmann's Answers", chap. 4). The unprepared, un- 
expected, unmotivated proposal of July 20 was suit- 
able only for exposing the Communist leadership by 
revealing- its inconsistency, lack of seriousness, inclina- 
tion to panic and adventuristic leaps. 

The policy of the Centrist bureaucracy helps the 
mighty pressure of events drives a hundred thousand 
new workers under the Communjist banner, it takes 
place in spite of the Stalin-Thalmann policy. Precisely 
because of this the future of the party is in no way 
assured. 



54 



CHAPTER SIX 



What They Say about the United Front 
in Prague^ 

T HEN THE Communist International made a 
\/y/ united front with the social democratic lead- 
ers in 1926," wrote the central organ of the 
Czechoslovaian Communist party, Rude Pravo, on 
February 27, 1932, allegedly in the name of a 
worker-correspondent "from the bench", "it did this in 
order to expose them before the masses of supporters, 
and at that time Trotsky was terribly opposed to it. 
Now, when the social democracy has so discredited it- 
self by its countless betrayals of the workers' strug- 
gles, Trotsky proposes the united front with its lead- 
ers . . . Trotsky is today against the Anglo-Russian 
Committee of 1926, but for any sort of Anglo-Russian 
Committee of 1932." 

These lines lead us right to the heart of the ques- 
tion. In 1926, the Comintern sought to "expose" the 
reformist leaders with the aid of the united front pol- 
icy, and that was right. But since then the social 
democracy has "discredited" itself. Before whom ? 
There are still more workers following it than the 
Communist party. This is sad but true. The task 
of exposing the reformist leadens thus remains un- 
solved. If the method of the united front was good 
in 1926, why should it be bad in 1932? 

"Trotsky is for an Anglo-Russian Committee of 
1932, against the Anglo-Russian Committee of 1926." 

55 



In 1926, the united front was concluded only at the 
top, between the leaders of the Soviet trade unions and 
the British trade unionists, not in the name of definite 
practical actions of the masses separated from each 
other by state frontiers and social conditions, but upon 
the basis of a friendly-diplomatic, pacifist-evasive 
"platform". During the miners' strike — and later the 
general strike — the Anglo-Russian Committee could 
not even come together, for the "allies" pulled in two 
opposite directions: the Soviet trade unions strove to 
assist the strikers, the British trade unionists sought 
to break the strike. The substantial contributions 
collected by the Russian workers were rejected by the 
General Council as "damned gold". Only after the 
strike had been finally betrayed and broken did the 
Anglo-Russian Committee come together again to the 
scheduled banquet to exchange small talk. Thus did 
the policy of the Anglo-Russian Committee serve to 
cover up the reformist strike-breakers before the work- 
ing masses. 

At the present time we are speaking of something 
quite different. In Germany the social democratic 
and the Communist workers stand on the same ground, 
before the same danger. They mingle with each other 
in factories, in trade unions, at the unemployment re- 
gistries, etc. It is not a question here of a word- 
"platform" of the leaders, but of thoroughly concrete 
tasks which are calculated to draw the mass organi- 
zations directly into the struggle. 

The united front policy on a national scale is ten 
times harder than on a local scale. The united front 
policy on an international scale is a hundred times 
harder than on a national scale. To unite with the 
British reformists around so general a slogan as "de- 
fense of the U. S. S. R." or "defense of the Chinese 
revolution", is to talk the blue out of the sky. In 



56 



Germany, on the contrary, there is the immediate dan- 
ger of the destruction of the workers' organizations, 
the social democratic included. To expect the social 
democracy to fight for the defense of the Soviet Union 
against the German bourgeoisie would be an illusion. 
But we certainly can expect that the social democracy 
will fight for the defense of its mandates, its meetings, 
periodicals, treasuries and finally, for its own head. 

Only, even in Germany we in no way advocate laps- 
ing into a united front fetishism. An agreement is 
an agreement. It remains in effect so long as it serves 
the practical goal for which it was concluded. If the 
reformists begin to curb or to sabotage the movement, 
the Communists must always put to themselves the ques- 
tion : is it not time to tear up the agreement and to 
lead the masses further under our own banner? Such 
a policy is not an easy one. But who has ever argued 
that to lead the proletariat to victory is a simple task? 
By counterposing the year 1926 to the year 1932, 
Rude Pravo has demonstrated only its lack of com- 
prehension of what occurred six years ago as well as 
what is happening today. 

The "worker-correspondent" from the imaginary 
bench also turns his attention to the example adduced 
by me of the agreement of the Bolsheviks with the 
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionists. "All that time", 
he writes, "Kerensky really fought for a certain time 
against Kornilov and at the same time helped the pro- 
letariat smash Kerensky. That the German social dem- 
ocracy today does not fight against Fascism is evident 
to any little child." 

The Thalmann who in no way resembles a "little 
child" contends that an agreement of the Russian Bol- 
sheviks with the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionists 
never even existed. Rude Pravo, as we see, pursues 
a different course. The agreement it does not deny. 



57 



But according to its conception, the agreement was 
justified by this, that Kerensky really fought against 
Kornilov, in distinction to the social democracy which 
is preparing the road to power for Fascism. The 
idealization of Kerensky here is quite astounding. When 
did Kerensky begin to fight against Kornilov? At the 
very moment when Kornilov swung the Cossack's saber 
over Kerensky's own head, that is, on the eve of Aug- 
ust 26, 1917. On the previous day, Kerensky was 
still in a direct conspiracy with Kornilov with the aim 
of jointly crushing the Petrograd workers and soldiers. 
If Kerensky began to "fight" against Kornilov or more 
correctly, to offer no resistance, for a time, to the fight 
against Kornilov, then it was only because the Bol- 
sheviks left him no other alternative. That Kornilov 
and Kerensky, both of them conspirators, broke with 
each other and came into open conflict, was to a cer- 
tain extent a surprise. That it would have to come 
to a collision between German Fascism and the social 
democracy, could and should have been foreseen, were 
it only on the basis of the Italian and Polish experi- 
ences. Why should an agreement with Kerensky 
against Kornilov have been concluded, and why is it 
forbidden to preach, to fight for, to advocate and to 
prepare an agreement with the social democratic mass 
organizations? Why must such agreements be de- 
stroyed wherever they have come into toeing? That, 
however, is just how Thalmann and Company proceed. 

Rude Pravo naturally pounced ravenously upon my 
words that an agreement on fighting actions may be 
made with the devil, with his grandmother and even 
with Noske and Grzesinski. "Look, Communist work- 
ers," writes the paper, "you've got to come to terms 
with Grzesinski who has already shot so many of your 
comrades-in-arms. Come to an agreement with him 
for he is to fight together with you against the Fasc- 

58 



ists, with whom he hobnobs at banquets and in the 
boards of management of factories and banks." The 
whole question is shifted here onto the plane of spuri- 
ous sentimentality. Such an objection is worthy of 
an anarchist, an old Russian Left wing Social Revolu- 
tionist, a "revolutionary pacifist" or of Miinzenberg 
himself. There isn't a glimmer of Marxism in it. 

First of all: is it correct that Grzesinski is a work- 
ers' hangman? Absolutely correct. But wasn't Ker- 
ensky a hangman of the workers and peasants in far 
greater measure than Grzesinski? Nevertheless, Rude 
Pkavo approves after the fact the practical agree- 
ment with Kerensky. 

To support the hangman in every action directed 
against the workers, is a crime, if not treachery : that 
is just what the alliance of Stalin with Chiang Kai- 
Shek consisted of. But if this same Chinese hangman 
were to find himself engaged tomorrow in a war with 
the Japanese imperialists, then practical fighting 
agreements of the Chinese workers with the hangman 
Chiang Kai-Shek would be quite permissible and even 
— a duty. 

Did Grzesinski hobnob with the Fascists at banquets? 
I do not know, but I'm quite prepared to grant it. 
Only, Gi*zesinski was subsequently obliged to sit in the 
Berlin prison, not in the name of socialism, it is true, 
but only because he was loath to give up his warm 
seat to the Bonapartists and the Fascists. Had the 
Communist party openly declared at least a year ago : 
against the Fascist assassins we are prepared to fight 
jointly even with Grzesinski: had it invested this for- 
mula with a fighting character, developed it in speech- 
es and articles, brought it into the depths of the mass- 
es— Grzesinski would have been unable to demend be- 
fore the masses, his capitulation, in July with refer- 
ences to the sabotage of the Communist party. He 

59 



would either have had to go along with this or that 
active step or else expose himself hopelessly in the eyes 
of his own workers. Isn't this clear? 

To be sure, even if Grzesinski were drawn into the 
struggle by the logic of his situation and the pressure 
of the masses, he would be an extremely unreliable, a 
thoroughly perfidious ally. His principal thought 
would be to pass over as quickly as possible from strug- 
gle or half-struggle to an agreement with the capi- 
talists. But the masses set into motion, even the so- 
cial democratic masses, do not come to a halt as easily 
as do outraged police chiefs. The approach between 
the social democratic and the Communist workers in 
the process of the struggle would offer the Communist 
party leaders a far broader possibility for influencing 
the social democratic workers, especially in face of the 
common danger. And that is precisely what the final 
aim of the united front consists in. 

* # # * 

To reduce the whole policy of the proletariat to 
agreements with the reformist organizations or, still 
worse, to the abstract slogan of "unity", is something 
that only spineless Centrists of the stripe of the So- 
cialist Workers Party can do. For the Marxists, the 
united front policy is merely one of the methods in the 
course of the class struggle. Under certain conditions 
this method becomes completely useless ; it would be 
absurd to want to conclude an agreement with the re- 
formists on the socialist upheaval. But there are 
conditions under which the rejection of the united 
front may ruin the revolutionary party for many de- 
cades to come. That is the situation in Germany at 
the present time. 

The united front on the international scale, as we 
have said above, contains the greatest difficulties and 
dangers, for there the formulation of the practical 

60 



tasks and the organization of mass control is harder. 
That is how matters stand above all in the question 
of the struggle against war. The prospects of joint 
actions are far slighter here, the possibilities of sub- 
terfuge and deception by the reformists and pacifists 
are far greater. By this, of course, we do not con- 
tend that the united front in this field is out of the 
question. On the contrary, we demanded that the 
Comintern should turn directly and immediately to the 
Second and the Amsterdam Internationals with the 
proposal for a joint anti-war congress. It would 
then have been the task of the Comintern to work out 
the most concrete possible obligations, applicable to 
the various countries and differing circumstances. 
Were the social democracy compelled to agree to such 
a congress, the problem of war, providing there were 
a correct policy on our side, could be driven into its 
ranks like a sharp wedge. 

The first premise for this : utmost clarity, political 
as well as organizational. There is involved an agree- 
ment of proletarian, million-membcrcd organizations, 
which are today still divided by deep antagonisms in 
principle. No ambiguous intermediaries, no diplomatic 
masqueradings and hollow pacifist formulae! 

The Comintern, however, found it proper this time 
also to act counter to the A B C of Marxism: while 
it refused to enter into open negotiations with the re- 
formist Internationals, it opened up negotiations be- 
hind the scenes with Friedrich Adlcr through the 

medium of the pacifist literary gentleman and first 

class muddlehead, Henri Barbusse. As a result of 
this policy, Barbusse gathered together in Amsterdam 
half-masked Communist or "related", "sympathizing" 
organizations and groups, together with the pacifist 
free lancers of all countries. The most honest and 
sincere among the latter — and they are the minority — 



61 



can each say for himself: "I and my confusion." Who 
needed this masquerade, this bazaar of intellectual- 
istic conceit, this Miinzenbergcrie, which turns 
into downright political charlatanry?* 

But let us return to Prague, Five months after 
the appearance of the article discussed above, the 
same journal printed the article of one of the party 
leaders, KL Gottwald, which bears the character of an 
appeal to the Czechoslovakian workers of the different 
tendencies to make fighting agreements. The Fascist 
danger menaces all of Central Europe: the onslaught of 
the reaction can be beaten off only by the unity of the 
proletariat ; no time should be lost, it is already "five 
minutes to twelve". The appeal is very passionately 
written. In vain, however, does Gottwald swear, fol- 
lowing Seydewitz and Thalmann, that he is not pursu- 
ing the interests of the party but the interests of the 
class: such a contrast is absolutely improper in the 
mouth of a Marxist. Gottwald stigmatizes the sabotage 
of the social democratic leaders. It is needless to say 
that the truth here is entirely on his side. Unfortun- 
ately, the author says nothing direct about the policy 
of the Central Committee of the German Communist 
Party: evidently he is not resolved upon defending it, 
but does not yet dare to criticize it. Gottwald him- 
self, nevertheless, goes into the painful question, not 

* The fact that the Brandlerites (see their Stuggart Tribune 
of August 27), carefully separated themselves from us in the 
question too, and supported the masquerade of Stalin, Man- 
uilsky, Losovsky, Muenzenberg, surprises us least of all. After 
supplying the model of their united front policy in Saxony 
in 1923, Brandler-Thalheimer thereupon supported the Stalin- 
ist policy towards the Kuo Min Tang and the Anglo-Russian 
Committee. How can they deprive themselves of the oppor- 
tunity to enlist under Barbusse's banner? if they did not, 
their political physiognomy would not be rounded out. 



62 



resolutely, it is true, but still fairly correctly. After 
he has called upon the workers of the various tendencies 
to come to an agreement in the factories, Gottwald 
writes : "Many of you may perhaps say : Unite there 
6 at the top', we 'below' will get together pretty easily. 
We believe", continues the author, "that the most im- 
portant thing is for the workers to agree 'below'. And 
as for the leaders : we have already said that we com- 
bine even with the devil if only it is directed against 
the rulers and in the interests of the workers. And we 
say to you openly: if your leaders give up their alli- 
ance with the bourgeoisie for even a single instant, 
proceed in reality against the rulers even in one ques- 
tion— we will greet it and support them in it." 

Almost everything necessary is said here, and almost 
the way it should be said. Gottwald did not even for- 
get to mention the devil, whose name the editorial board 
of Rude Pravo printed five months before in pious in- 
dignation. Gottwald did indeed omit the devil's grand- 
mother. But God be with her: for the sake of the 
united front we are ready to sacrifice her. Perhaps 
Gottwald would be prepared, for his part, to console 
the offended old dame by turning over to her disposal 
the article from Rude Pkavo of February 27, together 
with the inkwell "worker correspondent". 

Gottwald's political considerations, let us hope, are 
applicable not only to Czechoslovakia but also to Ger- 
many. And that is just how it should have been said. 
On the other hand, neither in Berlin nor in Prague can 
the party leadership confine itself to the bald declara- 
tion of its readiness for a united front with the social 
democracy, but must demonstrate this readiness in 
deeds, enterprisingly, in a Bolshevik manner, by means 
of quite definite practical proposals and actions. That 
is just what we demand. 

Gottwald's article, thanks to the fact that it rings 

63 



with a realistic and not an ultimatist tone, instantly 
found an echo among the social democratic workers : 
On July 31 there appeared in Rude Pravo a letter, 
among others, from an unemployed printer who had 
recently returned from a visit to Germany. The let- 
ter bears the imprint of a worker-democrat who is un- 
doubtedly afflicted with the prejudices of reformism. 
All the more important is it to pay attention to how 
the policy of the German Communist Party reflects it- 
self in his consciousness. "When in the spring of last 
year," thus writes the printer, "comrade Breitscheid 
directed to the Communist party the appeal to begin 
joint actions with the social democracy, he evoked in 
the Rote Fahne a veritable storm of indignation. So 
the social democratic workers said to themselves : 'Now 
we know how serious are the intentions of the Com- 
munists on the united front'." 

Here you have the genuine voice of a worker. Such 
a voice contributes more to the solution of the ques- 
tion than dozens of articles by unprincipled pen- 
pushers. As a matter of fact, Breitscheid did not pro- 
pose any united front. He only frightened the bour- 
geoisie with the possibility of joint actions with the 
Communists. Had the Central Committee of the 
Communist party promptly put the question right on 
the edge of the knife, the social democratic party lead- 
ership would have been pushed into a difficult position. 
But the Central Committee of the Communist party 
hastened, as always, to put itself into a difficult posi- 
tion. 

In the brochure What Next?, I happened to write 
on Breitscheid's speech: "Isn't it self-evident that 
Breitscheid's diplomatic and equivocal offer should 
have been grabbed with both hands; and that from 
one's own side, one should have submitted a concrete, 
carefully detailed and practical program for a joint 



64 



struggle against Fascism; and have demanded joint 
sessions of the executives of both parties, with the 
participation of the executives of the independent 
trade unions? Simultaneously, one should have carried 
this same program emergetically down through all the 
layers of both parties and of the masses." (Page 56.) 

By spurning the trial balloon of the reformist lead- 
ers, the Central Committee of the Communist party 
transformed in the minds of the workers the ambigu- 
ous assertion of Breitscheid into a direct united front 
proposal and prompted the social democratic work- 
ers to the conclusion: "Our people want joint actions, 
but the Communists are sabotaging." Can you im- 
agine a more inappropriate and stupider policy? Could 
Breitscheid's manceuver be better supported? The 
letter from the Prague printer demonstrates with re- 
markable plainness that, with Thahnann's aid, Breit- 
scheid completely attained his goal. 

Rude Pravo endeavors to perceive contradiction 
and confusion in the fact that in one case we reject 
an agreement, but in another, we acknowledge it and 
deem it necessary to determine anew each time the 
scope, the slogans and the methods of the agreement. 
Rude Pravo does not understand that in politics, as 
in all other serious fields, one must know well: what, 
when, where and how. Also it cannot hurt to under- 
stand: why. 

In our Criticism of the Strategy of the Comintern 
four years ago, we set down a few elementary rules 
for the united front policy. We consider it worth 
while to recall them here: 

"The possibility of betrayal is always imbedded in 
reformism. That does not mean, of course, that re- 
formism and betrayal are one and the same thing at 
every moment. Temporary agreements may be made 
with the reformists, if they take a step forward. But 



65 



to maintain a bloc with them when they commit treason 
shortly before the development of a movement, sig- 
nifies a criminal carelessness towards the traitors and 
a veiling of betrayal." (The Strategy of the World 
Revolution, page 51.) 

"The most important, best established and most un- 
alterable rule of every manoeuver says : One's own 
party organization should never be diluted, united or 
combined with another, no matter how 'friendly' the 
latter may still be today. Such a step should never 
be undertaken which leads, directly or indirectly, 
openly or maskedly, to the subordination of the party 
to other parties or to organizations of other classes and 
therewith limits the freedom of one's own agitation, or 
a step through which one is made responsible, even if 
only in part, for the political line of other parties. 
You shall not mix up the banners, not to speak of 
kneeling before another banner." (Ibid, pp. 60-61.) 

Today, after the experience with the Barbusse Con- 
gress, we would add still another rule: 

"Agreements should be reached only openly, before 
the eyes of the masses, from party to party, from or- 
ganization to organization. You shall not avail your- 
self of equivocal middlemen. You shall not palm off 
diplomatic affairs with bourgeois pacifists as a prole- 
tarian united front." 



66 



CHAPTER SEVEN 



The Class Struggle m the Light of the 
Economic Cycle 

If we have insistently demanded that a distinction be 
made between Fascism and Bonapartism, it has been 
in no wise out of theoretical pedantry. Names are 
used to distinguish between concepts ; concepts, in 
politics, in turn serve to distinguish among real forces. 
The smashing of Fascism would leave no room for 
Bonapartism, and, it is to be hoped, would mean the 
direct introduction to the social revolution. 

Only — the proletariat is not armed for the revolu- 
tion. The reciprocal relations between Social Dem- 
ocracy and the Bonapartist government on the one 
hand, and between Bonapartism and Fascism on the 
other — while they do not decide the fundamental ques- 
tions — distinguish by what roads and in what tempo 
the struggle between the proletariat and the Fascist 
counter-revolution will be prepared. The contradic- 
tions between Schleicher, Hitler and Wels, in the 
given situation, render more difficult the victory of 
Fascism, and open for the Communist party a new 
credit, the most valuable of all — a credit in time. 

"Fascism will come to power by the cold method", 
we have heard more than once from the Stalinist theor- 
eticians. This formula means that the Fascists will 
come to power legally, peacefully, through a coalition 
— without needing an open upheaval. Events have 
already refuted this prognosis. The Papen govern- 

67 



ment came to .power through a coup d'Etat, and it 
complemented it with a coup d'Etat in Prussia. Even 
if we assume that a coalition between Nazis and Cen- 
ter would overthrow the Bonapartist Papen govern- 
ment with "constitutional" methods, in and of itself 
this still decides nothing. Between the "peaceful" as- 
sumption of power by Hitler and the establishment of 
the Fascist regime there still lies a long way. A coali- 
tion would only mean the facilitation of the coup 
d'Etat, but not replace it. Along with the final aboli- 
tion of the Weimar constitution there would still re- 
main the most important task — the abolition of the or- 
gans of proletarian democracy. From this point of 
view, what does the "cold method" mean? Nothing 
else than the lack of resistance on the part of the 
workers. Papen's Bonapartist coup d'Etat remained 
in fact unpunished. Will not Hitler's Fascist up- 
heaval remain unpunished? It is precisely around this 
question that, consciously or unconsciously, the guess- 
ing about the "cold method" turns . 

If the Communist party represented an overwhelm- 
ing force, and if the proletariat were to march for- 
ward for the immediate seizure of power, all the con- 
tradictions in the camp of the possessing classes 
would temporarily be wiped out — Fascists, Bonapart- 
ists and democrats would stand in one front against 
the proletarian revolution. But this is not the case. 
The weaknesses of the Communist party and the 
splitting up of the proletariat permit the possessing 
classes and the parties which serve them to carry their 
contradictions out into the open. Only by support- 
ing itself on these contradictions will the Communist 
party be able to strengthen itself. 

But perhatps Fascism in highly-industrialized Ger- 
many will altogether decide not to validate its claims 
for full power? Undoubtedly, the German proletar- 

68 



iat is incomparably more numerous and potentially 
stronger than the Italian. Although Fascism in Ger- 
many represents a more numerous and better-organ- 
ized camp than Italy at the corresponding period, 
still the task of liquidating "Marxism" must appear 
both difficult and risky to the German Fascists. In 
addition, it is not excluded that Hitler's political peak 
has already been passed. The all-too-long period of 
waiting and the new barrier on its road in the shape 
of Bonapartism, undoubtedly weaken Fascism, inten- 
sify its internal frictions and might materially weaken 
its pressure. But here we enter a domain of tenden- 
cies which at the present moment cannot be calculated 
in advance. O n ly the living struggle can answer these 
questions. To build in advance on the assumption 
that national-socialism will inevitably stop half-way, 
would be most frivolous. 

The theory of the "cold method", carried to its 
conclusion, is not in the least better than the theory 
of "social-Fascism" ; more accurately, it only repre- 
sents the obverse of that theory. The contradictions 
among the constituents of the enemy's camp are in 
both cases completely neglected, the successive stages 
of the process blurred. The Communist party is left 
completely on the side. Not for nothing was the 
theoretician of the "cold method", Hirsch, at the same 
time the theoretician of "social-Fascism". 

The political crisis of the country develops on the 
foundation of the economic crisis. But economy too 
is not immovable. If yesterday we were obliged to 
say that the cyclical crisis only sharpens the funda- 
mental, organic crisis of the capitalist system, so to- 
day we must recall that the general decline of capital- 
ism does not exclude cyclical fluctuations. The pre- 
sent crisis will not last forever. The hopes of the 
capitalist world for a turn in the crisis are exag- 



69 



gerated to the utmost, but not groundless. The ques- 
tion of the struggle of political forces must be incor- 
porated into the economic perspectives. Papen's pro- 
gram makes it all the more impossible to postpone this, 
since it itself starts from the assumption of an ap- 
proaching economic improvement. 

The industrial revival steps on the scene for every- 
one to see as soon as it expresses itself in the form 
of growing turnover of goods, rising production, in- 
creased number of employed workers. But it does not 
begin in that way. The revival is preceded by pre- 
paratory processes in the field of money circulation 
and of credit. The capital invested in unprofitable 
undertakings and branches of industry must be re- 
leased and receive the form of liquid money which seeks 
investment. The market, freed of its fatty deposits, 
growths and swellings, must show a real demand. The 
entrepreneurs must gain "confidence" in the market 
and in each other. On the other hand, the "confidence" 
of which the world press speaks so much must be 
spurred on, not only by economic, but also by political 
factors (reparations, war debts, disarmament — -rearm- 
ament, etc.). 

A rise in the turnover of goods, in production, in 
the number of employed workers, is nowhere to be 
seen as yet; on the contrary, the decline continues. 
As to the processes preparatory to a turn in the crisis, 
they have obviously fulfilled the greater part of the 
tasks assigned to them. Many signs really permit us 
to assume that the moment of turn in the economic 
circle has approached, if it is not immediately before 
us. That is the estimation, seen on a world scale. 

But we must draw a distinction between the creditor 
countries (the United States, England, France) and 
the debtor countries, or more accurately, the bank- 
rupt countries ; the first place in the latter group is 

70 



occupied by Germany. Germany has no liquid capi- 
tal. Its economy can receive an impetus only through 
an influx of capital from outside. But a country 
which is not in condition to ip ( ay its old debts receives 
no loans. In any case, before the creditors open 
their money-bags they must be convinced that Germany 
is again in condition to export a greater amount 
than it needs to import ; the difference has to serve to 
cover the debts. The demand for German goods is 
to be expected primarily from the agrarian countries, 
in the first instance from South Europe. The agrar- 
ian countries, for their part, depend on the demand of 
the industrial countries for raw materials and food- 
stuffs. Germany will therefore be forced to wait; the 
stream of life will first have to flow through the series 
of its capitalist competitors and its agrarian counter- 
parts before it affects Germany's own economic per- 
formance. 

But the German bourgeoisie cannot wait. Still less 
can the Bonapartist clique wait. While it promises 
not to touch the stability of the currency, the Papen 
government is introducing a material inflation. To- 
gether with speeches on the rebirth of economic lib- 
eralism, it assumes the administrative disposition over 
the economic cycle; in the name of the freedom of pri- 
vate initiative it subordinates the taxpayers immedi- 
ately to the capitalist private entrepreneurs. 

The axis around w^hich the government program 
turns is the hope of a nearby turn in the crisis. If 
this does not take place soon, the two billions'* will 
evaporate like two drops of water on a red-hot stove. 
Papen's plan has immeasurably more of a gambling, 
speculative character than the bullish movement which 

*The number of marks in tax certificates given to capital- 
ists as a bonus under the Papen program. (Trans.) 



71 



is currently taking place on the New York Stock Ex- 
change. In any case, the consequences of a collapse 
of the Bonapartist gamble will be far more catas- 
trophic. 

The most immediate and tangible result of the gap 
between ihe plans cf the government and the actual 
movement of the market will consist in the slipping of 
the mark. The social evils, increased by inflation, will 
assume an intolerable character. The bankruptcy of 
the Papen economic program will demand its replace- 
ment by another and more effective program. Which 
one? Obviously by the program of Fascism. Once 
the attempt has failed to force the recovery through 
Bonapartist therapy, it must be tried with Fascist 
surgery. Social Democracy in the meantime will 
make "left" gestures and fall to pieces. The Com- 
munist party, if it does not put obstacles in its own 
way, will grow. All in all, this will mean a revolu- 
tionary situation. The question of the prospects of 
victory under these circumstances consists to the ex- 
tent of three-quarters of the question of Communist 
strategy. 

But the revolutionary party must also be prepared 
for another perspective, for that of a quicker appear- 
ance of a turn in the crisis. Let us assume that the 
Schleicher-Papen government were to succeed in main- 
taining itself until the beginning of a revival in com- 
merce and industry. Would it be saved thereby? No, 
the beginning of an upward movement in business would 
mean the certain end of Bonapartism and might even 
mean more. 

The forces of the German proletariat are not ex- 
hausted. But they have been undermined — by sacri- 
fices, defeats, disappointments, beginning with 1914; 
by the systematic betrayals of the Social Democracy, 
by the discredit which the Communist party has 



72 



thrown upon itself. Six or seven million unemployed 
hang like a heavy load on the feet of the proletariat. 
The emergency decrees of Bruening and Papen have 
found no resistance. The coup d'Etat of July 20 has 
remained unpunished. 

We can predict with full assurance that an upward 
turn in the cycle would give a powerful impetus to 
the activity of the proletariat, at present in decline. 
At the moment when the factory stops discharging 
workers and takes on new ones, the self -confidence of 
the workers is strengthened ; they are once again nec- 
essary. The compressed spirals begin to straighten 
out again. Workers always enter into the struggle 
for the reconquest of lost positions more easily than 
for the conquest of new ones. Neither emergency de- 
crees nor the use of the Reichswehr will be able to 
liquidate mass strikes which develop on the wave of 
the upturn. The Bonapartist regime, which is able 
to maintain itself only through the "social truce", will 
be the first victim of the upturn in the cycle. 

A growth of strike struggles is already to be ob- 
served in various countries (Belgium, England, Poland, 
in part in the United States, but not Germany). An 
evaluation of the mass strikes now developing, in the 
light of the world-wide economic cycle, is not an easy 
task. The statistics disclose fluctuations in the busi- 
ness cycle with unavoidable delay. The revival must 
become a fact before it can be registered. The work- 
ers usually sense the revival of economic life earlier 
than the statisticians. New orders or even the expec- 
tation of new orders, reorganization of enterprises for 
expansion of (production or at least the interruption of 
the discharge of workers, immediately increase the 
powers of resistance and the demands of the workers. 
The defensive strike of the textile workers in Lanca- 
shire was unquestionably called forth by a certain up- 

73 



turn in the textile industry. As to the Belgian strike, 
it is obviously taking place on the basis ot" the still 
deepening crisis of the coal mining industry. The 
transitional and turning-point character of* the pre- 
sent section of the world economic cycle corresponds to 
the variety of the economic impulses which are the 
basis of the most recent strikes. But in general the 
growth of the mass movement rather tends to indicate 
an upward turn which is about to become perceptible. 
In any case, a real revival of economic activity, even 
in its first stages, will call forth a broad upswing in 
the mass struggle. 

The ruling classes of all countries expect miracles 
from the industrial upswing; the speculation in stocks 
which lias already broken out is a proof of this. If 
capitalism were really to enter upon the phase of a new 
prosperity or even of a gradual but persistent rise, 
this would naturally involve the stabilization of capi- 
talism and at the same time a strengthening of re- 
formism. But there is not the least ground for the 
hope or fear that the economic revival, which in and of 
itself is inevitable, wall be able to overcome the general 
tendencies of decay in world economy and in European 
economy in particular. If pre-war capitalism devel- 
oped under the formula of expanded production of 
goods, present-day capitalism, with all its cyclical 
fluctuations, represents an expanded production of 
misery and of catastrophes. The new economic cycle 
will execute the inevitable readjustment of forces with- 
in the individual countries as well as within the capi- 
talist camp as a whole, predominantly toward Amer- 
ica and away from Europe. But within a very short 
time it will place the capitalist world before insoluble 
contradictions and condemn it to new and still more 
frightful convulsions. 

Without the risk of error, we can set up the follow- 

74 



ing prediction — the economic revival will suffice to 
strengthen the self-confidence of the workers and give 
a new impetus to their struggle, but it will in no way 
suffice to give capitalism, and /particularly European 
capitalism, the possibility of rebirth. 

The practical conquests which the new cyclical up- 
turn in declining capitalism will open to the workers' 
movement will necessarily bear a most limited charac- 
ter. Will German capitalism, at the height of the new 
revival in economic activity, be able to restore those 
conditions for the working class which existed before 
the present crisis? Everything compels us to answer 
this question in advance with, "No". All the more 
quickly will the awakened mass movement have to 
strike out along the road of politics. 

Even the very first step of the industrial revival 
will be most dangerous for Social Democracy. The 
workers will throw themselves into struggle to win 
back what they have lost. The leaders of Social 
Democracy will again base their hopes on the restora- 
tion of the "normal" order. Their main considera- 
tion will be the restoration of their fitness to join a 
coalition government. Leaders and masses will pull 
in opposite directions. In order to exploit to the 
limit the new crisis of reformism, the Communists need 
a correct orientation in the cyclical changes and the 
preparation sufficiently ahead of time of a practical 
program of action, beginning first of all with the 
losses suffered by the workers during the years of 
crisis. The transition from economic struggles to poli- 
tical ones will constitute an especially suitable moment 
for the strengthening of the power and influence of 
the revolutionary proletarian party. 

But success in this field as in others can be achieved 
only under one condition — the correct application of 
the policy of the united front. For the Communist 



75 



party of Germany this means, above all — an end of 
the present policy of sitting between two stools in 
the trade union field, a firm course toward the free 
trade unions, the drawing of the present cadres of 
the R. T. U. O. into the composition of the free trade 
unions, the opening of a systematic struggle for in- 
fluence on the shop councils by means of the trade 
unions, and the preparation of a broad campaign un- 
der the slogan of workers' control of production. 



76 



CHAPTER EIGHT 



TkeL> Road to Socialism 



Kaxitsky and Hilferding, among others, have 
declared more than once in recent years that 
they never shared the theory of the collapse of 
capitalism which the revisionists once ascribed to the 
Marxists and which the Kautskyans themselves now 
frequently attribute to the Communists. 

The Bernsteinians outlined two perspectives: one, 
unreal, allegedly orthodox-"Marxian", according to 
which, in the long run, under the influence of the in- 
ternal antagonisms of capitalism its mechanical col- 
lapse was supposed to take place; and a second, "real- 
istic", according to which a gradual evolution from 
capitalism to socialism was to be accomplished. An- 
tithetical as these two schemas may be at first glance, 
they are nevertheless united by a common trait: the 
absence of the revolutionary factor. While they dis- 
avowed the caricature of the automatic collapse of 
capitalism attributed to them, the Marxists demon- 
strated that under the influence of the sharpening class 
struggle, the proletariat would carry through the rev- 
olution much sooner than the objective contradictions 
of capitalism could lead to its automatic collapse. 

This dispute was carried on as long ago as the end of 
the past century. It must however be acknowledged 
that the capitalist reality since the war, approached, 
in a certain respect, much closer to the Bernsteinian 
caricature of Marxism than anyone might ever have 



77 



assumed, above all — the revisionists themselves: for 
they had only portrayed the spectre of the collapse in 
order to bring out its unreality. Nevertheless, capital- 
ism proves in actuality to be closer to automatic decay 
the more delayed is the revolutionary intervention of 
the proletariat in the destiny of society. 

The most important component part of the theory 
of collapse was the theory of pauperization. The 
Marxists contended with a certain caution that the 
sharpening of the social antagonisms need not neces- 
sarily be equivalent to an absolute sinking of the stand- 
ard of living of the masses. In reality, it is this latter 
process which is experiencing its unfolding. Wherein 
could the collapse of capitalism express itself more 
acutely than in chronic unemployment and the de- 
struction of social insurance, that is, in the refusal 
of the social order to feed its own slaves? 

The opportunistic brakes in the working class have 
proved to be powerful enough to grant the elementary 
forces of outlived capitalism additional decades of life. 
As a result, it was not the idyl of the peaceful trans- 
formation of capitalism into socialism which took 
place, but a state of affairs infinitely closer to social 
decay. 

The reformists sought for a long time to shift the 
responsibility for the present state of society upon the 
shoulders of the war. But in the first place, the war 
did not create the destructive tendencies of capitalism, 
but only brought them to the surface and accelerated 
them; secondly, the war would have been unable to ac- 
complish its work of destruction without the political 
support of reformism; thirdly, the hopeless contra- 
dictions of capitalism are preparing new wars from 
various sides. Reformism will be unable to shift the 
historical responsibility from itself. By paralyzing 
and curbing the revolutionary energy of the proletar- 



78 



iat, the international social democracy invests the pro- 
cess of the capitalist collapse with the blindest, un- 
ruliest, most catastrophic and bloodiest forms. 

Of course, one may speak only conditionally of a 
realization of the revisionist caricature of Marxism, 
applicable to a definite historical period. The way out 
of decaying capitalism, however, will be found, even 
if after a great delay, not upon the road of the auto- 
matic collapse but upon the revolutionary road. 

The present crisis has swept aside with a final flour- 
ish of the broom the remnants of the reformist utopias. 
Opportunist practice at the present time possesses 
no theoretical covering whatsoever. For in the long run 
it is pretty much a matter of indifference to Wels, Hil- 
ferding, Grzesinski and Noske as to the number of 
catastrophes that will still hurtle down upon the heads 
of the masses of the people, if only their own interests 
remain immune. Only, the point is that the crisis of 
the bourgeois regime strikes at the reformist leaders, 
too. 

"Act, state, act!" the social democracy stm uncd 
a short while ago, as it fell back before Fascism. And 
the state acted : Otto Braun and Severing were kicked 
into the street. — ISjow, wrote the Vouwaerts, every- 
body must recognize the advantages of democracy over 
the regime of dictatorship.— Yes, democracy has sub- 
stantial advantages, reflected Grzesinski while he made 
the acquaintance of prison from the inside. 

From this experience resulted the conclusion : "It is 
time to proceed to socialization !" Tarnow, yesterday 
still a doctor of capitalism, suddenly decided to become 
its grave-digger. Now, when capitalism has turned 
the reformist ministers, police chiefs and lord lieuten- 
ants into unemployed, it has manifestly exhausted it- 
self. Wels writes a programmatic article, "The hour 
of socialism has struck !" There only remains for 



79 



Schleicher to rob the deputies of their salary and the 
former ministers of their pension — and Hilferding will 
write a study on the historic role of the general strike. 

The "Left" turn of the social democratic leaders 
startles one with its stupidity and deceitfulness. This 
by no means signifies, however, that the manceuver is 
condemned in advance to failure. This party, laden 
with crimes, still stands at the head of millions. It 
will not fall of its own accord. One must know how 
to overthrow it. 

The Communist party will declare that the Wels- 
Tarnow course towards socialism is a new form of 
mass deception, and that will be correct. It will re- 
late the history of the social democratic "socializa- 
tions" of the last fourteen years. That will be useful. 
But it is insufficient: history, even the most recent, 
cannot take the place of active politics. 

Tarnow seeks to reduce the question of the revolu- 
tionary or the reformist road to socialism to the sim- 
ple question of the "tempo" of the transformations. 
Deeper a theoretician cannot sink. The tempo of the 
socialist transformations depends in reality upon the 
state of the productive forces of the country, its cul- 
ture, the extent of the overhead imposed upon it for 
defense, etc. But socialist transformations, the speedy 
as well as the slow, are possible only if at the sum- 
mits ,of society stands a class interested in socialism, 
and at the head of this class a party which does not 
dupe the exploited, and which is always ready to sup- 
press the resistance of the exploiters. We must ex- 
plain to the workers that precisely in that consists 
the regime of the dictatorship of the proletariat. 

Only, even this does not suffice. Once it is a ques- 
tion of the burning problems of the world proletariat, 
one should not — as the Comintern does — forget the 
fact of the existence of the Soviet Union. With re- 



80 



gard to Germany, the task today does not lie in com- 
mencing a socialist construction for the first time, but 
in tying together Germany's productive forces, its cul- 
ture, its technical and organizational genius with the 
socialist construction already in process in the So- 
viet Union. 

The German Communist Party confines itself to 
the mere eulogizing of the Soviet successes, and in this 
connection commits gross and dangerous exaggerations. 
But it is completely incapable of linking together the 
socialist construction in the U. S. S. R,., its enormous 
experiences and valuable achievements, with the tasks 
of the proletarian revolution in Germany. The Stalin- 
ist bureaucracy, on its part, is least of all in a position 
to render the German Communist Party any assistance 
in this highly important question : its perspectives are 
limited to one single country. 

The incoherent and cowardly state capitalistic pro- 
jects of the social democracy must be countered with 
a general plan for the joint socialist construction of 
the U. S. S. R. and Germany. Nobody demands that 
a detailed plan should be worked out instantly. A pre- 
liminary rough draft suffices. Foundation pillars are 
necessary. This plan must as speedily as possible be 
made the object of action by every organization of the 
German working class, primarily of its trade unions. 

Into this action must be drawn the progressive forces 
among the German technicians, statisticians and econ- 
omists. The discussions about planned economy so 
widespread in Germany, reflecting the hopelessness of 
German capitalism, remain purely academic, bureau- 
cratic, lifeless-pedantic. The Communist vanguard 
alone is capable of drawing the treatment of the ques- 
tion out of the charmed circle. 

The socialist construction is already in progress 

to this work a bridge must be thrown over the state 



81 



frontiers. Here is the first plan: study it, improve it, 
make it concrete! Workers, elect special planning 
commissions, charge them with entering into contact 
with the trade unions and economic organs of the So- 
viets. On the basis of the German trade unions, the 
factory councils and other labor organizations, create 
a central planning commission which has the job of 
entering into contact with the Gosplan of the U. S. 
S. 11. Draw into this work German engineers, organ- 
izers, economists ! 

This is the only correct preliminary to the ques- 
tion of planned economy, today, in the year 1932, after 
fifteen years of the existence of the Soviets, after four- 
teen years of convulsions of the German capitalist 
republic. 

Nothing is easier than to ridicule the social dem- 
ocratic bureaucracy, beginning with Wels, who has 
struck up a Song of Solomon to socialism. Yet, it 
must not be forgotten that the reformist workers have 
a thoroughly serious attitude to the question of so- 
cialism. One must have a serious attitude to the re- 
formist workers. Here the problem of the united 
front rises up once again in its full scope. 

If the social democracy sets itself the task (in words : 
we know that!), not to save capitalism but to build 
up socialism, then it must seek an agreement not with 
the Center but with the Communists. Will the Com- 
munist party reject such an agreement? By no means. 
On the contrary, it will itself propose such an agree- 
ment, demand it before the masses as a redemption of 
the just-signed Socialist promissory note. 

The attack of the Communist party upon the social 
democracy must proceed at the present time along 
three lines. The task of demolishing Fascism retains 
all its acuteness. The decisive battle of the proletar- 
iat against Fascism will signify simultaneously the 



82 



collision with the Bonapartist state apparatus. This 
makes the general strike an indispensable fighting 
weapon. It must be prepared. A special general 
strike plan must be worked out, that is, a plan for the 
mobilization of the forces to carry it out. Proceed- 
ing from this plan, to unfold a mass campaign. On 
the basis of this campaign, to propose to the social 
democracy an agreement for the carrying out of the 
general strike under definite political conditions. Re- 
peated and made concrete at every new stage, this pro- 
posal will lead in the process of its development to the 
creation of the Soviets as the highest organs of the 
united front. 

That Papen's economic plan, which has now become 
law, brings the German proletariat unprecedented pov- 
erty, is recognized in words also by the leaders of the 
social democracy and the trade unions. In the press, 
they express themselves with a vehemence they have 
not voiced for a long time. Between their words and 
their deeds lies an abyss, we know that well,— but we 
must understand how to pin them down to their word. 
A system of joint measures of struggle against the re- 
gime of emergency decrees and Bonapartism must be 
elaborated. This struggle imposed upon the proletar- 
iat by the whole situation cannot, by its very nature 
be conducted within the framework of democracy. A 
situation where Hitler possesses an army of 400,000 
men, Papen-Schlcicher, besides the Reichswehr, the 
semi-private Stahlhelm army of 200,000 men the 
bourgeois democracy the half-tolerated Reichsbanner 
army, the Communist party the proscribed Red Front 
army— such a situation by itself lays bare the problem 
of the state as a problem of power. A better revolu- 
tionary school cannot be imagined! 

The Communist party must say to the working 
class: Schleicher is not to be overthrown by any par- 



83 



liamentary game. If the social democracy wants to 
set to wo A to overthrow the Bonapartist government 
with other means, the Communist party « > ready to 
aid the social democracy With all its strength. At the 
same time, the Communists obligate themselves m ad- 
vance to use no violent methods against a social dem- 
ocratic government insofar as the latter bases it el 
upon the majority of the working class and I u*ofa 
it guarantees the Communist party the freedom of agi- 
tation and organization. Such a way of putting ; the 
question will be comprehensible to every social dem- 
ocratic and non-party worker. 

The third line, finally, is the fight for sonahsm. 
Here too the iron must be forged while it is hot and 
the social democracy pressed to the wall with a con- 
crete plan of collaboration with the U. S. S. R. What 
is necessary on this point has already been said above 
Naturally, these sectors of struggle, which are of 
varying significance in the complete strategical per- 
spective, are not separated from each other but rather 
overlap and merge. The political crisis of society de- 
mands the combining of the partial questions with the 
general questions: precisely therein hes the essence of 
the revolutionary situation. 



84 



CHAPTER NINE 



The_» Only Road 



Can it be expected that the Central Commit- 
tee of the Communist party will independently 
accomplish a turn to the right road? Its whole 
past demonstrates that it is incapable of doing this. 

Hardly had it begun to rectify itself than the ap- 
paratus saw before it the perspective of "Trotsky- 
ism". If Thalmann himself did not grasp it immedi- 
ately, then he was told from Moscow that the "part" 
must be sacrificed for the sake of the "whole", that 
is, the interests of the German revolution for the sake 
of the interests of the Stalinist apparatus. The 
abashed attempts to revise the policy were once more 
withdrawn. The bureaucratic reaction triumphed again 
all along the line. 

It is not, of course, a matter of Thalmann. Were 
the present-day Comintern to give its sections the 
possibility of living, of thinking and of developing 
themselves they would long ago, in the last fifteen 
years, have been able to select their own leading cadies. 
But the bureaucracy erected instead a system of ap- 
pointed leaders and their support by m- ans oP arti- 
ficial ballyhoo. Thalmann is a product of this system 
and at the same time its victim. 

The cadres, paralyzed in their development, weaken 
the party. They supplement their inadequacy with 
repressions. The vacillations and the uncertainty of 



85 



the party are inexorably transmitted to the class as a 
whole. The masses cannot be summoned to bold ac- 
tions when the party itself is robbed of revolutionary 
determination. 

Even if Thalmann were to receive tomorrow a tele- 
gram from Manuilsky on the necessity of a turn to 
the path of the united front policy, the new zi£-Z0g 
at the top would bring little good. The leadership is 
too compromised. A correct policy demands a healthy 
regime. Party democracy, at present a plaything of 
the bureaucracy, must rise again as a reality. The 
party must become a party, then the masses will be- 
lieve it. Practically, this means to put upon the order 
of the day: an extraordinary party convention and an 
extraordinary congress of the Comintern. 

The party convention must naturally be preceded 
by an all-sided discussion. All apparatus barriers 
must be razed. Every party organization, every 
nucleus has the right to call to its meetings and listen 
to every Communist, member of the party or ex- 
pelled from it, if it considers this necessary for the 
working out of its opinion. The press must be put at 
the service of the discussion; adequate space must be 
allotted daily for critical articles in every party paper. 
Special press commissions, elected at mass meetings 
of the party members, must see to it that the papers 
serve the party and not the bureaucracy. 

The discussion, it is true, will require no little time 
and energy. The apparatus will argue: how can the 
party permit itself the "luxury of discussion" at such 
a critical period? The bureaucratic saviors believe 
that under difficult conditions the party must shut up. 
The Marxists, on the contrary, believe that the more 
difficult the situation, the more important the inde- 
pendent role of the party. 

The leadership of the Bolshevik party enjoyed, in 



86 



1917, a very great esteem. And notwithstanding this, 
a series of deep-going party discussions took place 
throughout the year 1917. On the eve of the October 
overturn, the whole party debated passionately which 
of the two sections of the Central Committee was right : 
the majority, which was for the uprising, or the min- 
ority, which was against the uprising. Expulsions, and 
repressions in general, were nowhere to be seen, in spite 
of the profundity of the differences of opinion. Into 
these discussions were drawn the non-party masses. 
In Petrograd, a meeting of non-party working women 
dispatched a delegation to the Central Committee in 
order to support the majority in it. To be sure, the 
discussion required time. But in return for that, there 
grew out of the open discussion, without threats, lies 
and falsifications, the general, indomitable certainty 
of the correctness of the policy, that is, that which 
alone makes possible the victory. 

What course will things take in Germany? Will 
the small wheel of the Opposition succeed in turning 
the large party wheel in time? That is how the ques- 
tion stands now. Pessimistic voices are often raised. 
In the various Communist groupings, in the party it- 
self, as well as its periphery, there are not a few ele- 
ments who say to themselves : in every important ques- 
tion the Left Opposition has a corrct stand. But it 
is weak. Its cadres are small in number and polit- 
ically inexperienced. Can such an organization, with 
a small weekly paper (Die Permanente Revolution) 
successfully counterpose itself to the mighty Comintern 
machine? 

Tiie lessons of events are stronger than the Stalin- 
ist bureaucracy. We want to be the interpreters of 
these lessons to the Communist masses. Therein lies 
our historic role as a faction. We do not demand, as 
do Seydewitz and Co., that the revolutionary prole- 
tariat should believe us on credit. We allot ourselves 



87 



a more modest role: we propose our assistance to the 
Communist vanguard in the elaboration of the correct 
line For this work we are gathering and training 
our own cadres. This stage of preparation may not 
be jumped over. Every new stage of struggle will 
push to our side those in the proletariat who reflect 
the most and are most critical. 

The revolutionary party begins with an idea, a 
program, which is aimed against the most powerful ap- 
paratus of class society. It is not the cadre that creates 
the idea, but the idea that creates the cadre. Fear 
of the power of the apparatus is one of the most con- 
spicuous features of that specific opportunism which 
the Stalinist bureaucracy cultivates. Marxian critic- 
ism is stronger than any and every apparatus. 

The organizational forms which the further evolu- 
tion of the Left Opposition will assume, depend upon 
many circumstances: the momentum of the historical 
blows, the degree of resisting power of the Stalin 
bureaucracy, the activity of the rank and file Com- 
munists, the energy of the Opposition itself. But the 
principles and methods we fight for have been tested by 
the greatest events in world history, by the victories 
as well as by the defeats. They will make their way. 

The successes of the Opposition in every country, 
Germany included, are indisputable and manifest. But 
they are developing slower than many of us expected. 
We may regret this, but we need not be surprised at 
it. Every Communist who begins to listen to the Left 
Opposition is cynically given the choice by the bureau- 
cracy : either go along with the baiting of "Trotsky- 
ism" or else be kicked out of the ranks of the Comin- 
tern. For the (party official, it is a question of position 
and wages : the Stalinist apparatus plays this key to 
perfection. But immeasurably more important are the 
thousands of rank and file Communists who are torn 



88 



between their devotion to the ideas of Communism and 
the threatened expulsion from the ranks of the Com- 
intern. That is why there are in the ranks of the of- 
ficial Communist party a great number of partial, in- 
1 1 m 1 cl a ted or concealed Oppositionists. 

This extraordinary combination of historical condi- 
tions sufficiently explains the slow organizational 
growth of the Left Opposition. At the same time, in 
spite of this slowness, the spiritual life of the Comin- 
tern revolves, today more than ever before, around the 
struggle against "Trotskyism". The theoretical per- 
iodicals and theoretical newspaper articles of the C. 
P. S. U., as well as the other sections of the Comin- 
tern, are chiefly devoted to tin.- struggle ngainst the 
Left Opposition, now openly, now maskedly. Still 
more symptomatic in significance is that mad organi- 
zational baiting which the apparatus pursues against 
the Opposition: disruption of its meetings by blackjack 
methods ; employment of all sorts of other physical 
violence: behind-the-scene agreements with bourgeois 
pacifists, French Radicals and Freemasons against the 
"Trotskyists" ; the dissemination of envenomed calum- 
nies from the Stalinist center, etc., etc. 

The Stalinists perceive much more directly and 
know better than the Oppositionists to what extent 
our ideas are undermining the pillars of their appar- 
atus. The methods of self-defense of the Stalinist fac- 
tion, however, have a double-edged character. Up to 
a certain moment, they have an intimidating effect. 
But at the same time they prepare a mass reaction 
against the system of falsity and violence. 

When, in July 1917, the government of the Men- 
sheviks and the Social Revolutionists branded the Bol- 
sheviks as agents of the German General Staff, this 
despicable measure succeeded at first in exercising a 
strong influence upon the soldiers, the peasants and 



89 



the backward strata of the workers. But when all the 
further events clearly confirmed how right the Bolshe- 
viks had been, the masses begun to say to themselves: 
so they deliberately slandered the Leninists, they basely 
incited against them, only because they were right? And 
the feeling of suspicion against the Bolsheviks was con- 
verted into a feeling of warm devotion and love for 
them. Although under different conditions, this very 
complex process is taking place now too. By means 
of a monstrous accumulation of calumnies and repres- 
sions, the Stalinist bureaucracy has undeniably suc- 
ceeded for a period of time in intimidating the rank 
and file party members ; at the same time, it is prepar- 
ing for the Bolshevik-Leninists an enormous rehabili- 
tation in the eyes of the revolutionary masses. At the 
present time, there can no longer be the slightest doubt 
on this score. 

Yes, today we are still weak. The Communist party 
still has masses, but already it has neither doctrine nor 
strategic orientation. The Left Opposition has al- 
ready worked out its Marxian orientation, but as yet 
it has no masses. The remaining groups of the "Left" 
camp possess neither the one nor the other. Hope- 
lessly the Leninbund pines away, thinking to sub- 
stitute the individual fantasies and whims of Urbahns 
for a serious principled policy. The Brandlerists, in 
spite of their apparatus cadre, are descending step 
by step; small tactical recipes cannot replace a revolu- 
tionary-strategical position. The S. A. P. has put 
up its candidacy for the revolutionary leadership of 
the proletariat. Baseless pretension! Even the most 
serious representatives of this ^party" do not over- 
step, as Fritz Sternberg's latest book shows, the bar- 
riers of Left-Centrism. The more assiduously they 
seek to create an "independent" doctrine, the more 
they reveal themselves to be disciples of Thalheimer. 
But this school is as hopeless as a corpse. 

90 



A new historical party cannot arise simply because 
a number of old social democrats have convinced them- 
selves, very belatedly, of the counter-revolutionary 
character of the Ebert-Wels policy. A new party can 
just as little be improvised by a group of Communists 
who have as yet done nothing to warrant their claim 
to proletarian leadership. For a new party to arise, 
it is on the one hand necessary to have great historical 
events, which would break the backbone of the old 
parties, and on the other hand, a position in principle 
worked out, and cadres tested, in the experience of 
events. 

While we are fighting with all our strength for the 
rebirth of the Comintern and the continuity of its 
further development, we are least of all inclined to 
any fetishism of form. The fate of the proletarian 
world revolution stands, for us, above the organization- 
al fate of the Comintern. Should the worst variant 
materialize; should the present official parties, despite 
all our efforts, be led to a collaipse by the Stalinist 
bureaucracy ; should it mean in a certain sense to begin 
all over again, then the new International will trace 
its genealogy from the ideas and cadres of the Com- 
munist Left Opposition. 

And that is why the short-term criteria of "pessim- 
ism" and "optimism" are not applicable to the work 
which we are carrying through. It stands above the 
separate stages, the, partial defeats and victories. O ur 
policy is a policy of long range. 



91 



Aftefwor d 



The present brochure, whose different parts were 
written at different times, had already been 
finished when a telegram from Berlin brought the 
news of the conflict of the overwhelming majority of 
the Reichstag with the Fapen government and consequ- 
ently with the Reich President. We expect to follow 
the "concrete development of subsequent events m the 
columns of the Perinanente Revolution. Here we wish 
only to emphasize some general conclusions, which 
seemed to be open to criticism when we began the 
brochure and which thanks to the testimony of facts, 
have since become incontestable. 

1 The Bonapartist character of the Schleicher- 
Papen government has been completely disclosed by its 
isolated position in the Reichstag. The agrarian- 
capitalist circles which stand directly behind the pre- 
sidential government constitute an incomparably 
smaller percentage of the German nation than the 
percentage of votes given for Papen in the Reichstag. 

2. The antagonism between Papen and Hitler is 
the antagonism between the agrarian-capitalist leader- 
ship and the reactionary petty bourgeoisie. Just as 
once the liberal bourgeoisie used the revolutionary 
movement of the petty bourgeoisie, but employed every 
means to keep it from seizing the power, so the mono- 
polistic bourgeoisie is prepared to reward Hitler as 
its lackey, but not as its master. Without compelling 
necessity it will not turn over the full power to Fasc- 
ism. 

3. The fact that the various fractions of the grand, 
middle and petty bourgeoisie are carrying on an open 
struggle for power, without avoiding a most dangerous 
conflict, proves that the bourgeoisie does not see itself 



92 



as being immediately threatened by the proletariat. 
Not only the national-socialists and the Center, but 
also the leaders of the Social-Democracy have dared 
enter on a struggle for tJie constitution only in the 
firm confidence that it will not change into a revolu- 
tionary struggle. 

4. The only part}^ whose vote against Papen was 
dictated by revolutionary purposes is the Communist 
party. But it is a long way from revolutionary pur- 
poses to revolutionary achievements. 

5. The logic of events is such that the struggle for 
"parliament" and for "democracy" becomes for every 
social-democratic worker a question of power. Therein 
lies the main content of the whole conflict from the 
standpoint of the revolution. The question of power 
is the question of the revolutionary unity in action 
of the proletariat. The policy of the united front 
toward the Social Democracy must be prepared in the 
very near future to render possible, on the basis of 
proletarian democratic representation, the creation of 
class organs of struggle, i. e., of workers 9 Soviets. 

6. In view of the gifts to capitalists and the mon- 
strous attack on the standard of living of the prole- 
tariat, the Communist party must set up the slogan 
of zvorkers* control of production. 

7. The fractions of the possessing classes can 
afford to quarrel among themselves only because the 
revolutionary Party is weak. The revolutionary party 
could become immeasurably stronger if it would cor- 
rectly exploit the quarrels among the possessing class- 
es. For this it is necessary to know how to distin- 
guish the various fractions according to their social 
composition, but not to throw them all into one heap. 
The theory of "social Fascism", which has completely 
and finally been bankrupted, must at last be thrown 
out as worthless junk. 

PrinMpq, September 14, 1932. — L. TROTSKY. 

93 



Other Works By 

LEON TROTSKY 

Problems of the Development of the 
U. S. S. R. .15 

Postage: One cent extra per copy. 

Strategy of the World Revolution .25 

Postage: One cent extra per copy. 

The Permanent Revolution 

180 pages cloth 1.00 

paper .50 
Postage: Six cents extra per copy. 

Problems of the Chinese Revolution 

450 pages cloth 1.50 

paper 1 .00 
Postage: 10 cents extra per copy. 

Communism and Syndicalism .15 

Postage: One cent extra per copy. 

The Spanish Revolution in Danger .15 

Postage: One cent extra per copy. 



PIONEER PUBLISHERS 
84 East 10th Street, New York, N. Y. 



Pioneer Publishing Fund 



In the four and a half years of its exist- 
ence the Communist League of America 
(Opposition) has brought out fifteen of the 
contemporary works of Leon Trotsky of 
which this pamphlet is one, and one work 
by a member of the League. These con- 
stitute a priceless addition to the litera- 
ture of Marxism and will become the texts 
by which the future cadres of the revolu- 
tionary movement will be educated. 

The publication of this pamphlet and the 
works we have projected was and will be 
made possible through the operation of the 
Publishing Fund. This is a fund which is 
raised by Pioneer Publishers for the sole 
purpose of bringing out these works. The 
fund is made up of donations and short- 
and-long-term loans. All the funds raised 
by this means are used exclusively for the 
publishing work, and are repaid out of the 
sale of the pamphlets. A strict account of 
all funds received and expended is kept and 
rendered. 

All readers of this pamphlet who are 
seriously interested in the Marxist educa- 
tion of the revolutionary vanguard and the 
working class are urged to make donations 
to this fund. Readers who are in a posi- 
tion to make loans to the fund are asked 
to write to 

PIONEER PUBLISHERS 
84 East 10th Street, New York, N, Y. 



Workers' Pocket Series 



By LEON TROTSKY 

In Defense of the Russian Revolution 

Full text of the speech delivered to the 

socialist students in Copenhagen 
48 pages 5 cents 

Soviet Economy !n Danger 

A penetrating analysis of the situation on 
the eve of the second five year plan. 
72 pages J- 0 cents 

Unemployment and the American 
Working Class 

by Arne Swabeck 
A Marxian analysis for workers 
24 pages , 5 C!?nts 

The Left Opposition of the Comintern 

by Max Shachtman 
A popular explanation of the origin of the 
International Left Opposition and 
what it stands for. 
72 pages 10 cents 



Postage: One cent extra per copy. 

PIONEER PUBLISHERS 
84 East 10th Street, New York, N. Y 



